






















   
 
 
 

 
 

 

 

Decentralized AR/VR ecosystem  

for 3D content exchange 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 
  
 
        White Paper v7.5 

 
                         ​ico.cappasity.com 

 
        © Copyright 2018 Cappasity Inc. All rights reserved. 

 

https://ico.cappasity.com/


 

 

 

 

 

 

Abstract​                                                                                                                                                              5 

Introduction to the AR/VR context​                                                                                                        ​6 
Why do AR/VR technologies matter​                                                                                                                       6 
The market today                                                                                                                                                       9 

     ​Market projections promise AR/VR  exponential growth                                                                         9 
           ​AR/VR implemented  across various industries                                                                                       13  
            ​The AR/VR value chain                                                                                                                                 14  

AR/VR industry hurdles​                                                                                                                                15 
     ​Lack of compelling content 

15  

        ​Content distribution intricacies                                                                                                                 16  

        ​Envisioned solution                                                                                                                                      19 

Cappasity background​                                                                                                                                    ​21 
   ​Cappasity: how it all began​                                                                                                                         21 
   ​The Team​                                                                                                                                                        23 
    ​Advisory                                                                                                                                                         26 

Cappasity Ecosystem​                                                                                                                                      ​31 
How does it all work: the scheme​                                                                                                                          31 
Ecosystem structure​                                                                                                                                                 35 
AR/VR Ecosystem blockchain​                                                                                                                                  37 
What are the benefits of blockchain as it used in the Cappasity Ecosystem?​                                               39 
Decentralized content storage​                                                                                                                               39 
Marketplace economy​                                                                                                                                             42 

Gaming: 3D model sale for videogames                                                                                                   46  
Live events: 360-degree video call for tender​                                                                                         46 
Video entertainment: 3D graphics for consumer AR app                                                                     47   
Retail: virtual 3D exhibition, VIP showrooms,  social e-commerce​                                                     47 
3D printing: 3D models for medical students​                                                                                          48 
Social VR: 3D avatar for sharing and fashion​                                                                                           48  

Ecosystem content moderation                                                                                                                             49 

Cappasity ​Token (CAPP)                                                                                                                                 53 
Cappasity utility currency​                                                                                                                                        53 
Cappasity endowment funds​                                                                                                                                  53  
Milestone roadmap                                                                                                                                                  55 

Conclusion​                                                                                                                                                        56 

Appendices​                                                                                                                                                       57 

AR/VR hardware, software and content​                                                                                                               57 
Bibliography​                                                                                                                                                               61 
 

 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

THIS DOCUMENT DOES NOT GIVE PERSONAL LEGAL OR FINANCIAL ADVICE. YOU ARE STRONGLY             
ENCOURAGED TO SEEK YOUR OWN PROFESSIONAL LEGAL AND FINANCIAL ADVICE. 

1. The Cappasity Token (CAPP) White Paper (hereinafter — ‘the White Paper’, ‘the            
Document’) is presented for informational purposes only. Cappasity Token is also known as AR              
token. 
2. Nothing in the Document shall be construed as an offer to sell or buy securities in any                 
jurisdiction, or a solicitation for investment, or an investment advice. The Document does not              
regulate any sale and purchase of the CAPP (as referred to in the White Paper). The sale and                  
purchase of the CAPPs is governed by the Terms and Conditions. 
3. Several estimates, phrases and conclusions incorporated in the White Paper constitute           
forward-looking statements. Such statements or information concern matters that involve          
uncertainties and risks, which may result in material differences from the results anticipated. 
4. The White Paper may be updated or altered, with the latest version of the Document               
prevailing over previous versions and we are not obliged to give you any notice of the fact or                  
content of any changes. The latest version of the White Paper in English is available at the website                  
https://ico.cappasity.com/. While we make every effort to ensure that all data submitted in the              
White Paper is accurate and up to date at the point in time that the relevant version has been                   
disseminated, the proposed document is no alternative to consulting an independent 3rd party             
opinion. 
5. The White Paper and the related documents may be translated into languages other than              
English. Should a conflict or an inconsistency arise between the English language version and a               
foreign language version, the English language version of the Document shall govern and prevail. 
6. The White Paper does not constitute an agreement that binds Cappasity. Cappasity, its             
directors, officers, employees and associates does not warrant or assume any legal liability arising              
out of or related to the accuracy, reliability, or completeness of any material contained in the                
White Paper. To the fullest extent pe​rmitted by any applicable law in any jurisdiction, Cappasity               
shall not ​be liable for any indirect, special, incidental, consequential or other losses, arising out of                
or in connection with the White Paper including but not limited to: loss of revenue, income or                 
profits, and loss of data. Persons who intend to purchase CAPPs, should seek the advice of                
independent experts before committing to any action, set out in the White Paper. 
7. You do not have the legal right to participate in the CAPPs digital asset public sale if you are                   
a citizen or other representatives of any jurisdiction whether the issue of CAPPs would be illegal or                 
subject to any requirement for registration, licensing or lock-up. 
8. You agree that you purchase, receive and hold the CAPPs at your own risk and that the                 
CAPPs are provided on an ‘as is’ basis without warranties of any kind, either express or implied. It                  
is your responsibility to determine if you are legally allowed to purchase the CAPPs in your                
jurisdiction and whether you can then resell the CAPPs to another purchaser in any given               
jurisdiction. You bear the sole responsibility for determining or assessing the tax implications of              
your participation in the crowdsale, purchasing, or receiving and holding the CAPPs in all respects               
and in any relevant jurisdiction. 
9. No regulatory authority has examined or approved of any of the information provided in              
this White Paper. No such action has been or will be taken under the laws, regulatory                

 

https://www.coinbase.com/legal/securities-law-framework.pdf
https://www.coinbase.com/legal/securities-law-framework.pdf


 

 

 

 

requirements or rules of any jurisdiction. 
10. The regulatory status of tokens and distributed ledger technology is unclear or unsettled in              
many jurisdictions. It is difficult to predict how or whether regulatory agencies may apply existing               
regulation with respect to such technology and its applications, including the Cappasity Ecosystem             
and CAPP. It is likewise difficult to predict how or whether legislatures or regulatory agencies may                
implement changes to law and regulation affecting distributed ledger technology and its            
applications, including the Cappasity Ecosystem and CAPP. Regulatory actions could negatively           
impact the Cappasity Ecosystem and CAPP in various ways, including, for purposes of illustration              
only, through a determination that the purchase, sale and delivery of CAPPs constitutes unlawful              
activity or that CAPPs are a regulated instrument that requires registration, or the licensing of               
some or all of the parties involved in the purchase, sale and delivery thereof. 

The Cappasity Ecosystem may cease operations in a jurisdiction in the event that regulatory              
actions, or changes to law or regulation, make it illegal to operate in such jurisdiction, or                
commercially undesirable to obtain the necessary regulatory approval(s) to operate in such            
jurisdiction. 
11. Given that CAPP is based on the Ethereum protocol, any malfunction, breakdown or             
abandonment of the Ethereum protocol may have a material adverse effect on CAPP. Moreover,              
advances in cryptography, or technical advances such as the development of quantum computing,             
could present risks to CAPP and the Cappasity Ecosystem, including the utility of CAPP, by               
rendering ineffective the cryptographic consensus mechanism that underpins the Ethereum          
protocol. 
12. As with other decentralized cryptographic tokens based on the Ethereum protocol, CAPP is             
susceptible to attacks by miners in the course of validating CAPP transactions on the Ethereum               
blockchain, including, but not limited, to double-spend attacks, majority mining power attacks,            
and selfish-mining attacks. Any successful attacks present a risk to the Cappasity Ecosystem, CAPP,              
including, but not limited t o, accurate execution and recording of transactions involving CAPP. 
 
  

 



 

 

 

 

 

Abstract 

We believe that content creators will drive 3D revolution. That is why we are introducing the first                 

platform that solves the problem of creating and embedding 3D and AR/VR content in an               

affordable way. The Cappasity platform uses blockchain infrastructure to store and manage 3D             

digital assets copyrights.  

CAPP token is issued both to store the digital asset rights and as a payment solution for the                  

Cappasity ecosystem. The Cappasity ecosystem is used by enterprises and ordinary users. The             

ecosystem encompasses a content storage, a decentralized copyrights storage, CAPP Wallet,           

Internal Exchange, API for the third-party developers, free utilities and modules allowing users to              

connect to the platform via websites, mobile and AR/VR applications. Developers will be supported              

through Cappasity Innovation Fund – ​www.cappasity.vc 
 
The CAPP tokens are Cappasity’s digital asset and their main utility is the creation of a digital                 

license for the content stored on the Cappasity platform or partners’ platforms. 

 

The cost of one copyright record creation is equal to 1 CAPP and does not depend on the exchange                   

rate of the token. We keep track of copyrights on digital content using blockchain technology. In                

this case, one token is used to encode one 3D View or one 3D model. 

 

CAPP tokens enable us to encode copyrights to store them in the blockchain, this process cannot be                 

done without the tokens. We will provide users with an API to validate copyrights or retrieve data                 

of a particular piece of content. 

 

DEVELOPERS OF APPLICATIONS BASED ON UNITY OR OTHER ENGINES 

 

Developers that use content in their applications via the Cappasity plugins can utilize our              

technology for free, but they have to create copyright records for the content stored on their                

accounts. For instance, if a developer produces a VR/AR store with a thousand objects, they shall                

use 1000 CAPP to get the necessary licenses. In this case, we guarantee that the content will not be                   

used in any other application since the plugin validates the data before the app is prepared to be                  

released. Developers, for their part, voluntarily confirm that they have all the necessary rights on               

the created content. 

 

WHAT ELSE ARE THE CAPP TOKENS USED FOR? 

 

Users need tokens to rent and buy content and services within the platform. In addition, the tokens                 

are used to support the third-party developers via the grants fund – the Cappasity Innovation Fund. 
 

 

 

http://www.cappasity.vc/


 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Introduction to the 3D/AR/VR context 
Why do 3D/AR/VR technologies matter 

 
 

“ 
 

There’s always a richer, more immersive medium 

to experience the world, and after video, the next logical step          

is fully immersive virtual reality. 

 
Mark Zuckerberg​, Facebook CEO at the Oculu      
Connect​1 

The top-tech companies bet on virtual as well as augmented realities thereby expecting them to               

shake up many industries and massively reboot our lifestyle and behavior as it happened with the                

Internet in the 90s and smartphones in the new millennium. Google, Apple, Samsung, Huawei,              

Facebook among other top-techs drive the race and dedicate significant budgets​2 ​to support their              
own AR/VR programs and product lines. 

 
While often mentioned together, augmented and virtual realities are not the same technology.             

Virtual reality implies immersion into a virtual world which is completely isolated from reality. VR               

uses goggles that completely cover the user’s field of vision, creating the illusion of transferring the                

user to a virtual space. 

 
In contrast to virtual reality, augmented reality doesn’t remove the physical world but enriches it               

by superimposing digital objects developed with the help of computer graphics software or other              

techniques. The user is aware of both, the virtual and the physical, and may interact simultaneously                

with virtual objects as well as with the real world. The most familiar implementation of augmented                

reality was in aviation​3 ​almost half a century ago — it helped pilots navigate through fog by                 
overlaying necessary indications on the screen showing their surroundings. 

 
In recent years, we have witnessed a new resurgence of AR and VR technologies. Since the                

tremendous success​4 ​of VR gaming device Google’s Oculus Rift on Kickstarter in 2012, we have seen                
more and more releases in the hi-tech AR/VR market which have encouraged investors and              

analysts like Google Cardboard, Samsung Gear and  ​Pokémon Go​. 
 
Though the technology is still in its early stages, investors are unanimous about the AR/VR’s bright                

 



 

 

 

 

future. AR and VR technologies presage an increased level of digital immersion and             

interconnectivity between the online and offline spaces. As the technology evolves, no doubt it will               

see more widespread adoption amongst consumers and business. Despite the VUCA​5 environment,            
such certainty is not groundless or reckless at all. It is supported by two clear trends in the society:                   

immersion and participatory culture.  

 

If anything can be considered a precedent for VR technologies, it’s participatory or immersive              

theater, which has faced a high demand in the past few years, starting with show Sleep No More​6​,                  
which opened in 2011 and was followed by a number of prominent stagings. Audience              

members were thrilled to be treated as a part of the performance and were encouraged to                

participate in the story and interact with actors​7​. Immersive theater is a natural partner to VR                
technologies, as creators seek to deliver theater to the general public through VR experiences, such               

as the Delusion immersive theater series​8​. 
 
The trend for immersion is the logical conclusion of the participatory culture which displaced              

consumer culture in the Web 2.0 era​9​. The central concept of this culture is that a consumer should                  
evolve into a proactive participant and contributor to the environment they belong to, leading to               

the new term “prosumer.” In general, society is no longer content to passively consume content               

and services but wants to be a part of it instead. 

 
According to Clay Bavor, VP of Virtual and Augmented Reality at Google, we are on the frontier of                  

an era of immersive computing driven by AR and VR technologies​10​. Immersive computing will              
remove the level of abstraction with which we interact with the digital world, just like when                

touchpads and smartphones first became popular a decade ago, and will create a myriad of new                

experiences of environmentally aware computing, rich in lifelike context. 

 

  

 



 

 

 

 

AR/VR history timeline 

 

19th century  PANORAMIC PAINTINGS the 360-degree murals 
● 1838​ - ​STEREOSCOPIC PHOTOS & VIEWERS  
                      the Stereoscope ​(Charles Wheatstone)  

● 1849 - the Lenticular Stereoscope​ (David Brewster)  
● 1929 - « LINK TRAINER​ (Edward Link) The 1st entirely electromechanical Flight Simulator. 
Brain processes the different two-dimensional images from each eye into a single object of three 
dimensional 

● 1930s - SCIENCE FICTION STORY PREDICTED VR 
Stanley G. weinbaum in Pygmalion's Spectacles expressed the idea of a pair of goggles that let the wearer 
experience a fictional world through holographics, smell, taste and touch 

● 1939 - The View-Master​ ​(William Gruber) 
● 1950s - « SENSORAMA​ ​(Morton Heilig) A theater cabinet for full film immersion stimulating all 
the senses by stereo speakers, stereoscopic 3D-display, fans, smell generators and vibrating chair. 
● « TELESPHERE MASK​ (Morton Heilig) The first VR Head mounted Display. 
● « HEADSIGHT ​(Comeau & Bryan) The first motion tracking HMD by Plico Corporation. 
● 1965 - The Ultimate display​ - ​concept simulating a virtual world indistinguishable from actual 
reality viewed through a HMD and appeared realistic through augmented 3D sound and tactile feedback. 
● 1968 - « SWORD OF DAMOCLES​ ​(Ivan Sutherland, Bob Sproull) The first VR/AR head mounted 
display connected to a computer and not a camera. 
● 1969 - « ARTIFICIAL REALITY​ ​(Myron Kruegere) A series of responsive computer-generated 
environments: GLOWFLOW, METAPLAY, PSYCHIC SPACE and VIDEOPLACE tech. 
● 1987 - « THE DATAGLOVE​ ​(Jaron Lanier, Tom Zimmerman) VR gloves 
                            ​« THE EYEPHONE​ ​(Jaron Lanier) VR goggles 
● 1991 - VIRTUALITY GROUP ARCADE MACHINES ​realtime multiplayer gaming experience with 
immersive stereoscopic 3D visuals. 
● 1992 - The Lawnmower Man​ - ​movie introduced the concept of virtual reality to a wider 
audience. 
● 1993 - SEGA VR headset for the Sega Genesis console​ ​The wrap-around prototype glasses had 
head tracking , stereo sound and LCD screens in the visor. 
● 1995 - The Nintendo Virtual Boy ​(originally known as VR-32) This 3D gaming console was hyped 
to be the first ever portable console that could display true 3D graphics, though met a commercial failure 
due to the poor software. 
● 1997 - « TOURING MACHINE​ ​(Steve Feiner  et al.) The first mobile AR system (MARS) which 
included see-through HMD with integral orientational tracker , differential GRS, digital radio for wireless 
web access and a hand-held computer with stylus and touchpad interface had to be carried around in a 
backpack. 
● 1999 - The Matrix film hits​ - ​theaters with a major cultural impact bringing the topic of simulated 
reality into the mainstream. 

 

 

 

 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

The market today 
 
 

“ 
 

The smartphone is for everyone, we don't have to think the           

iPhone is about a certain demographic, or country or vertical          

market: it’s for everyone. I think AR is that big, it’s huge. I get              

excited because of the things that could be done that could           

improve a lot of ​lives. And be entertaining. 
Tim Cook​, Apple CEO 

interview for The Independent​11 

 

Market projections promise AR/VR exponential growth 
 

According to International Data Corporation (IDC) analytics published in August 2017, the            

worldwide AR/VR revenue will jump as high as $215 bn by 2021, achieving 113.2% CAGR along the                 

way​12​. 
 

IDC worldwide spending on 

AR/VR forecast 
Source: IDC Research 

Regional spending on AR/VR in 2017 
Source: IDC Research 

 

 

 

 

 

   

Digi-Capital consulting holds a more conservative point of view. In their Augmented/Virtual Reality             

 



 

 

 

 

Report for 2017 they predict the AR/VR market will reach $108bn in 2021. Their estimations are                

based in the AR/VR market’s performance in 2016. Digi-Capital’s AR/VR forecast for 2016 was              

$4.4bn with $3.8bn of that VR revenue and $0.6bn AR. The firm says, VR was overestimated and                 

accrued $2.7bn revenue only, but AR overbalanced the projection adding $1.2bn partly due to the               

incredible popularity of ​Pokémon Go​13​. In the near future the company sees mobile AR as the                
leading force. Taking into account that giants like Facebook and Apple have already stated their               

interest in the AR sector, it is expected to make a giant leap soon. 

 
The abundance of the M&A deals and investment volume in AR/VR proves that this young and                

evolving market is highly promising and attractive. Large tech companies are hungry for AR/VR              

innovative startups. Digi-Capital calculated that the AR/VR deal volume in 2016 amounted to $2.3              

bn with the highest acquisition, that of hardware player Magic Leap, raising $793.5mn at a $4.5 bn                 

valuation​14​. 
 

 
 

Digi-Capital AR/VR revenue ($bn) forecast 

Source: Digi-Capital 

Digi-Capital AR/VR investments  (2016) 
Source: Digi-Capital 

 

 

 

Citi in its Citi GPS: Global Perspectives Solutions 2016 report on virtual and augmented reality               

evaluated the current AR/VR market at $7.5bn, with $3.9bn attributed to software, content and              

services. The bank’s analysts believe ​the focus will shift from AR hardware to software and ​expect                
the latter to reach $276bn by 2025​15​. From there, Citi says, AR headsets will start replacing                
smartphones and finally ​overtake the current market of mobile smartphones. AR smart glasses may              
even be the primary device for phone calls and data transmission. Also AR commerce is predicted                

to take the place occupied by e-commerce today. The purchases made by users on smartphones in                

the next few years will be made using AR, so the usage of AR will also be similar to that of mobile                      

smartphones today. 
 

 
 

 



 

 

 

 

Citi VR/AR market scale forecasts 

Source: Citi Research 

Citi AR headset market growth in expense of the 

smartphone market 

Source: Citi Research 

 

 

Citi expects the VR disruption to begin with the gaming industry, expanding further to              

entertainment activities such as live events, theme parks, movies and TV programs. In the report,               

Citi predicts around half of existing games will be converted to the VR format, which will become                 

the main format for the game industry. Another application is a substitute for the virtual tours                

offered on websites. It also has the potential to reshape the main tools used for conferencing                

systems. The other area that would be affected by VR is the movie industry. As of March 2017, the                   

total number of leading VR HMD platforms sold is reported to be 18,151,410 units​16​. 
 

Total VR HMDs sold (leading platforms): 18,151,410 

Source: thevirtualreport.biz (updated 3rd March 2017)

 

 

   

 



 

 

 

 

Worldwide virtual reality revenue by segment 
Source: ​SuperData Research 

 

 

 

 

According to Superdata Research’s cautious estimates, the VR market in 2017 will grow more              

than twice in comparison to the last year (from $1.8bn to $3.7bn) and will see a 15-fold increase by                   

2020. The major driver of growth is seen to be VR software and compelling content estimated to                 

reach $16.2bn and surpass hardware earnings for the first time by 2020​17​. 
 
Goldman Sachs estimated the AR/VR market value by industries and engaged users in its first               

report of the Profiles and Innovations series dedicated to Virtual and Augmented Reality and              

published in 2016. According to the investment bank, AR/VR will shake up markets to the tune of                 

$80bn by 2025, where the software market will occupy $35bn with 60% of AR/VR software revenue                

driven by the consumer (vs. enterprise​18​). The technologies promise to affect the business             
landscape across many industries. 

 

   

 



 

 

 

 

 

Total addressable AR/VR software market 
Source: Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research 

 

 

AR/VR implemented across various industries 
 

Meanwhile AR/VR technologies have been recently sneaking into various industries for both            

businesses and consumers. VR dominates primarily in the videogame industry nowadays, although            

it has already been implemented in far more cases. Sotheby’s uses VR technology to show homes                

for their clients without an agent​19​. 3D tours allow virtual visitors to immerse themselves into the                
atmosphere of their luxury homes without even setting a foot inside. The tours are created using                

special cameras placed strategically throughout a home. Ford is applying VR technology for design              

and engineering purposes. The main aim of the Ford Immersive Vehicle Environment lab (FIVE) is to                

help engineers and designers improve their early concepts​20​. The lab gives them the opportunity to               
experience a concept before a physical prototype is produced. FIVE also enhances international             

collaboration between designers and engineers thus helping to achieve the  goal. 

 
One of the most innovative companies in 2017, as ranked by Fast Company, Next VR created a                 

platform that allows users to view live events in virtual reality creating an even more immersive                

experience​21​. They have already partnered with CNN, FOX Sports, HBO/Golden Boy. Spectators may             
watch the International Champions Cup or the NBA finals as if they were there in person. In the                  

near future, VR is expected to become indispensable for different kind of trainings and educational               

programs, as well as for the real estate and entertainment businesses. 

 

AR has become a widely discussed phenomenon in 2016 due to the success of the ​Pokémon Go                 
game. Nevertheless, AR has great potential to change the landscape of professional fields such as               

engineering, design and surgery, where instant access to certain information is of the utmost              

importance. At the same time, AR is revolutionizing the  e-commerce field. 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 
Amazon has recently acquired two patents, demonstrating its interest in AR technology​22​. The first              
patent, titled “Augmented Reality Representation,” allows users to “try on” different products            

using data from e-commerce websites with the help of cameras and sensors. This technology may               

help diminish the number of returns, as customers will be able to try the product before purchase.                 

The second patent, titled “Forming a Representation of an Item with Light,” describes a technology               

that projects a product’s image into a room. For users it means they get an opportunity to see how                   

a piece of furniture they like would fit into the exact room they have in mind. Other large online                   

retailers such as Alibaba are also taking proactive steps to integrate AR into their current business,                

in hopes of improving the customer experience, increase their conversion rate and engage             

millennials​23​. 
 

The AR/VR value chain 
 

Being a highly advanced technology field, the AR/VR market comprises hardware, software and             

content segments. The value chain of the AR/VR market is made up of four segments that may be                  

represented as follows: 

 

Source: BOM “Virtual reality. Augmented reality. Hype or serious business?” 2017 report​24 
 

Here, the infrastructure segment stands for all AR/VR hardware such as headsets, goggles, mobile              

interfaces, etc., and is mainly driven by top-tech companies. Other stakeholders include users (the              

demand side) and developers and content creators (the supply side). Users consume AR/VR             

content via various applications, while content creators and developers supply those applications.            

The latter are involved in infrastructure development as they build toolkits and software             

compatible with a specific hardware platform. AR and VR technologies are evolving separately; the              

main market players and breakthroughs will be reviewed in ​Appendices​. 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 



 

 

 

 

 

AR/VR industry hurdles 
Lack  of compelling content 

 
 

“ Just as content was the fuel that launched many successful          
technology products, our respondents clearly believe that       

high-quality and robust content is key to moving the AR/VR          

industry forward. 

Kirk Soderquist​, co-chair of Perkins Cole’s 
Interactive Entertainment practice 

Although various big market players have launched their own VR hardware, not many people use it                

on a regular basis, and it is still far from becoming mainstream. One of the top reasons is the lack of                     

compelling content​25​. Inadequate content was named by 38% of the respondents of the survey by               
Perkins Coie and Upload as the main challenge facing the AR/VR industry​26​. The survey              
encompassed more than 650 respondents including IT startup founders, executives of technology            

companies and investors. 

 
The value chain of any technology intensive industry can be described as follows: infrastructure,              

tools & platforms and content. Value for the user is created when all the segments are developed                 

and optimized. AR/VR finds itself in a kind of "chicken or egg" situation. The demand for AR/VR                 

hardware will be slow to pick up unless the users are provided with quality content and services.                 

On the other hand, the content and services will remain slow to develop and prosper unless there                 

is a demand for AR/VR headsets.​27 
 
At the dawn of the Internet in the first half of 1990s, only a few people had access to the Internet                     

and the content was rather expensive and of limited value. Due to constrained computer power               

and bandwidth the first pages could be filled only with text. Tools and platforms were prohibitive                

for general users as it required HTML, Javascript and coding skills. Then, step by step, the Internet                 

evolved into a commodity accessible to everyone. 

 
The situation currently observed in AR/VR industry is very similar to when the Internet appeared.               

The content generation is resource consuming and pricing is prohibitive for end-users. The choice              

in stores of Oculus and HTC Vive is limited and the added value is still low​28​. But the infrastructure                   
and tools are gaining momentum. Smartphones’ high resolution displays and 3D graphics            

processors combined with mobility have already made them good AR/VR devices. New emerging             

software platforms like Apple ARKit, WearVR, and that of Facebook promise to deliver easier and               

 



 

 

 

 

 

cheaper VR content creation than is available now with Unity and Unreal Engine development              

tools. 

 
AR/VR content needs to keep up, as it is not unreasonably believed to be a potential catalyst for                  

AR/VR expansion.​29 ​The appearance of high quality content bases contributed to huge            
breakthroughs in many areas of artificial intelligence. For instance, take ImageNet​30 ​database’s            
impact on the computer vision field. The majority of AI achievements were preceded by the               

availability of large open datasets, although the key algorithms were developed well before that​31​.              
Other examples include the algorithms needed for speech recognition or Google Arabic/Chinese to             

English translation. It was actually the corpus of Spoken Wall Street Journal articles that led to the                 

breakthrough in human speech recognition, three years after the formation of the corpus and 10               

years after the development of the Hidden Markov Model that lies at the core of recognition                

technology. In a similar fashion the statistical machine translation algorithm was first introduced in              

1988, but only the collection of 1.8 trillions tokens from Google web and news pages in 2005                 

empowered Google translation from Chinese and Arabic to English. 

 
Just as with AI, the disruption in AR/VR may happen as soon as developers get access to enough                  

AR/VR and 3D content, widespread and affordable content which is compatible with the variety of               

available platforms and hardware. 

 

Content  distribution intricacies 
 

The threat of a lack of content or of underwhelming content that the AR/VR industry faces today                 

requires actions to be taken in order to provide content creators with fertile ground. The top-tech                

and VCs’ initiatives to support content creators through AR/VR specific incubators and            

accelerators are of undoubted importance.​32 ​However, there are black holes in the AR/VR industry              
space that prevent content from proliferating. The barriers include: 

● the disunity of different platforms intentionally retained by the leading IT companies; 
● the existing marketplaces’ domination over content makers which is reflected   by 
unreasonable commissions imposed on the content  stocks; 

● low protection from the original content resale and copyright infringement. 
All the reasons above can be considered problems of content distribution which make content              

makers feel powerless and discourage them from sufficient content creation. So, the low             

motivation of content makers leads to the content shortage and disappointing  content quality. 

 
Dominance of marketplaces 
Nowadays the majority of 3D content marketplaces care more about their business KPIs than              

community development. The content makers’ royalty rates on these sites are not higher than              

60% on average, sometimes, dipping as low as 30%. Royalty rates higher than 70% may be                

achieved on some platforms, but only on the terms of content exclusivity. 

 
 



 

 

 

 

3D content base  Royalty 

Turbosquid  40% - 80% 

CGTrader  70% - 90% 

Daz 3D  50% - 65% 

Renderosity  50% - 70% 

3Docean  30% - 70% 

3Dexport  60% - 70% 

CreativeCrash  55% 

 

Source: lifewire.com 

In addition, a content maker’s sales depend mostly on their marketing efforts, as voting systems               

are underdeveloped and buyers are not incentivized to rank content. Such unstable and low              

revenue makes freelance a better option for the artists who want to earn money.​37 ​Moreover, the                
infrastructure is not benevolent to content buyers either: they don’t have an option to test the                

models, to check the compatibility of content with different hardware or development            

environments, or to embed the content in the places they will be used, and, as a consequence,                 

some users face import problems​38​ ​39​ ​40​. 
 
Concerned with their own commercial gain, existing marketplaces can hardly meet the demands             

of the coming AR/VR breakthrough that will be desperate for high quality 3D models for AR/VR                

software development. 

 
Copyrights 
When compared to 2D image space, the problem of copyright is rather new for 3D models, and the                  

tools for preventing infringement are underdeveloped. Watermarks can’t be applied to 3D models             

as the 3D models have different viewing and usage. The search system through 3D databases of                

intellectual property isn’t developed either. 

 
However, marketplaces that sell original content inevitably have to deal with copyright issues. In              

the absence of an automated monitoring system the databases fail to protect users from violation               

of their copyrights. So, monitoring of 3D databases for copyright issues is only possible via the                

system of user reports, and the existing 3D marketplaces try to protect authorship by introducing               

complaint systems and subsequent removal of infringing content. Although user complaints help            

detect some cases of unauthorized use of content, they can’t prevent the violation of copyrights               

completely. In fact, 3D content marketplaces can only rely on the integrity of their users, because                

the marketplaces do not provide any incentive system for these  actions. 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 
Since the databases can’t guarantee proper copyright protection they are cautious about granting             

use rights and limit consumers in content usage. For example, Turbosquid doesn’t allow images to               

be used in open virtual worlds such as CS:GO, justifying it with the argument that “TurboSquid’s                

artist community does not believe the IP protections for their work are sufficient in these worlds”.                
41 

 
Turbosquid​42 ​and CG Trader​43 ​try to prevent copyright infringement by differentiating two types of              
licenses. Editorial use may be only applied to purposes relating to events of public interest and                

other non-commercial purposes. Royalty free licenses grant a buyer the rights to use a model for                

commercial purposes including education, 3D printing, product design, films, video game           

development and AR/VR application development without having to pay fees for the end product              

sold. 3D Export​44 ​provides basic and extended licenses. The latter allows the buyer to use 3D                
models in the end product for commercial purposes. According to the End User License Agreement               

at 3DExport the content buyer must ensure that the model cannot be separated from the software                

produced. Renderosity​45 ​also provides extended licenses for some products and draws extra            
attention to the fact that the model shouldn’t be stored in a place where it will be accessible by                   

another person. 

 
Though the licensing options define the terms of use, they barely help to protect content makers’                

rights. A failure to protect the copyright of the 3D content creation may result in serious issues as                  

the AR/VR industry gains momentum and the demand for 3D content grows. 
 

Envisioned solution 
 

“ ...it is important to have lots of content creators working togethe          
now, because the technology companies have got the technology        

to a stage where the industry and consumers are ready for it. Bu            

I think it is now content creatives that will drive the next wave o             

improvement. 

Neil Graham​, Executive Producer at Sky VR
Studios for Citi ​4

It is indisputable that content is one of the major drivers that will boost AR/VR development.                

Therefore, the future of AR/VR technologies largely depends on content creators and on the              

opportunities the AR/VR industry will unveil for them. Content makers should feel like empowered              

and appreciated members of a larger AR/VR community. 

 

 



 

 

 

 

Unfortunately, the AR/VR field has not been consolidated like the machine intelligence            

community, but it is coming along. It has recently started segregating into a separate discipline               

while new AR/VR academic programs are emerging. So, all efforts and actions aimed at bringing               

our community together under one roof are coming at just the right time. Though we need to be                  

sure that all community members are equally respected: be they platform and tool suppliers,              

content makers or content consumers, such a requirement can only be met by a decentralized               

organization or an ecosystem that doesn’t pursue one party’s business success metrics. 

 

The solution should provide content makers with easy and scalable tools for content generation in               

order to engage new artists and stimulate content exchange. To facilitate transaction flows among              

the parties, digital currency will be highly valuable as it will help to globalise the ecosystem and                 

avoid complexities in money transferral. 

 
We believe that such an environment may be able to compensate for the shortfalls of AR/VR/3D                

content as well as act as a valuable springboard to boost AR/VR industry growth and to create the                  

conditions to meet its market volume projections. 

 

   

 



 

 

 

 

 

 
Cappasity  background 

Cappasity: how it all began 
 

The Cappasity story began when a team of professionals with a strong record in 3D gaming                

participated in a project which required a large number of 3D models. To the team’s surprise, the                 

creation of a single game character took up to two weeks. In order to facilitate the process and                  

make it cheaper the team designed a prototype of a 3D scanner. Soon it became clear that 3D                  

content production and integration could be deployed in more industries than just gaming:             

engineering, the automotive sector, trading, etc. 

 
This is when Cappasity was established, with the aim to develop an easy and a fast platform for                  

3D content mass-production. In 2013, being a young and ambitious company, we seriously             

examined the retail and fashion industries, as this market was starving for new AR/VR and 3D                

visualization solutions for their businesses. E-commerce is the ideal medium for such innovations:             

consumers enjoy trying on clothes in online stores before buying, studying products closely, and              

using their tablets to see if a chosen piece of furniture fits into the bedroom, etc. Willing to take a                    

chance, we decided to tap into this emerging industry, which demonstrates an extraordinary             

growth rate.​51 
 
Until recently, 3D technology was time-consuming and not suitable for mass production.​52 ​For             
instance, 3D scanners were (and still are) rather expensive and the creation of a single 3D image                 

took up to 30 minutes. That didn’t meet the fast-paced requirements of fashion and online retail                

when new catalogues contain thousands of items and catalogue updates occur every two to three               

months. Moreover, previously available 3D scanning technologies were not tailored for the            

specifics of fashion merchandise. They failed to capture textures such as transparent elements,             

glistening surfaces or black matted surfaces. The resulting 3D image files were heavy, slowed web               

page download and negatively affected the view time. 

 
Cappasity set its sights on developing tools to revolutionize AR/VR and 3D technologies — and               

succeeded. We introduced a professional 3D digitizing solution comprising: 

 

● Easy 3D Scan® software, which generates a 3D image in two to three minutes and is                
capable of digitizing thousands of items per day. 

● 3D View a new format, revolutionizing the concept of 3D digitizing.  
 

This format does not overload a website with heavy traffic: The download rate is four times faster                 

on average, as we are streaming the data and enable users to interact with an object if only 30%                   

of it is downloaded. 

 



 

 

 

 

● 3D Hologram - a new format, compatible with various AR/VR devices. 
● API used for synchronization with product catalogs: We implement Cappasity tools for            
customers’ e-stores; Additionally, Cappasity tools show better compatibility with various browsers           

than most comparable alternatives. 

● Cappasity.AI to analyze customer interaction with 3D content and provide a customer            
interest heatmaps for each product. 

 
We deliver a 3D digitizing solution that has become easier, faster and much more friendly than                

could be imagined a couple of years ago. Over more than four years on the market, we have                  

attracted the attention of leading brands: We established relationships with large merchants and             

fashion brands. Top luxury retailers have announced conversion increase by 10-40% after            

implementing 3D imaging, and 91% of customers say they want to have the option to have a                 

360-degree view of products.​53 
 

Cappasity has been working with Intel since 2014, and developed a 3D scanning software for               

Intel® RealSense™ 3D cameras — Easy 3D Scan™ is featured on the Intel RealSense Showcase.               
Cappasity has successfully raised $4.9M and launched its platform and 3D digitizing software in              

2017. 

 

Today, each month the platform serves more than 1,000,000 views of 3D content. Furthermore,              

the company provides a comprehensive solution to create content for virtual (VR) and augmented              

reality (AR). The platform features were designed to be open to other developers using Unity,               

Unreal Engine, Apple ARKit and Google ARCore technology. 

 

Cappasity graduated from Plug and Play Retail (Sunnyvale) Batch 7 accelerator and Lafayette Plug              

and Play acceleration program in Paris. 

 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 



 

 

 

 

 

The Team 
 

The Cappasity founders have been working with 3D technologies for more than 15 years. Initially,               

they started with PC projects and moved on to video and mobile games. 
 

 

 

Kosta Popov 
Cappasity CEO 

LinkedIn 

 

Alex Chegaev 
CTO, Co-Founder 

Kosta Popov, Cappasity CEO and Founder, has       
over 10 years track record as a software        
company CEO. Under Kosta’s lead the company       
successfully raised over $1.8M from angel      
investors since 2014 and launched Cappasity      
platform and 3D digitizing software in January       
2017. Kosta is an expert in 3D technologies,        
SaaS solutions and mobile applications. 
Kosta is one of the most notable and active         
members of Intel Software Innovators program.      
As a result of his outstanding work, Intel has         
awarded him with a title of the Worldwide 'Top         
Intel Software Innovator' in 2016. 
Prior to Cappasity, Kosta has been a Founder        
and CEO of a videogames production company,       
releasing titles for PC, Sony PSP, Microsoft Xbox        
360, Sony PlayStation 3, Apple iOS, Google       
Android. Kosta is also known as the President of         
RADIT, an international association of     
developers and publishers of the game industry       
and interactive technologies, that carries out      
non-commercial base innovative,   
scientific-technical and implementation   
activities, organizes the program document     
forming and its adjustment with the leading       
representative of the Game Industry. 
Kosta is the author of Cappasity's patents.       
Cappasity’s 3D scanner, based on his      

Cappasity’s CTO and Co-Founder, Alex has over       
9 years of expertise in 3D technologies and        
system architecture of software products. Alex      
is responsible for overall technology vision and       
product development, managing full P&L for      
product development, software and hardware     
purchases and R&D. He leads all aspects of        
architecture, software and product    
development, including all make vs. buy      
analysis, investment rationalization, and    
delivery schedule for high transaction     
applications. 
Previously he worked with Kosta for 7 years in         
video games business. He led the development       
of 3D engine and took part in production of         
around 12 cross-platform products for PCs,      
consoles and mobile devices. 
Since 2017 he is leading the 3D web and         
blockchain technology development. Alex is     
managing a team of 10 developers. 
Education: A M.S. in Robotics Engineering from       
Moscow State Institute of Radio Engineering,      
Electronics and Automation. 
 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/popovks/


 

 

 

 

inventions, won the TOP-10 Award at IDF 2015. 

 

Marianna Weber 
CBDO, Co-Founder 

LinkedIn 

 

Natalie Reyes 
CSO 

LinkedIn 

Cappasity’s Chief Business Development Officer     
and Co-Founder, Marianna Weber has a      
business development and digital marketing     
background. She is in charge of building       
relationships with the company’s core partners 
She joined the team in 2015 and is responsible         
for building the key partnerships for Cappasity       
worldwide. Marianna met Cappasity team at      
one of the networking events and plunged into        
the project with an inspiring enthusiasm. She       
has since mapped out the business      
development strategy for scaling and     
established the relationships with key partners      
in the main directions of growth – enterprise        
retailers (luxury and mass market brands),      
e-commerce website building platforms for     
faster scaling (Shopify, Magento, PrestaShop,     
etc.), retail and technology partners. 
With a commitment to superior performance,      
Marianna has led Cappasity through Plug and       
Play Retail Accelerator in Sunnyvale, which      
resulted in attracting a number of large US and         
international retailers on board. She has been       
representing Cappasity as a speaker at      
numerous conferences and events, TechCrunch     
Disrupt San Francisco 2017, LVMH Moët      
Hennessy Louis Vuitton Innovation Award and      
World Blockchain Forum to name a few. 
Marianna holds a Master’s degree from the       
University of Greenwich and a Bachelor’s      
degree from Lancaster University with     
specialization in business studies and     

As Cappasity’s Chief of Sales, Natalie Reyes is 
responsible for driving sales, increasing brand      
awareness and driving revenue of the      
Company. She is aligning Cappasity’s objectives      
with business strategy, sales forecasting, and      
strategy development, and is accountable for      
effective sales organization design. She also      
establishes and maintains productive    
peer-to-peer relationships with customers and     
partners. 
To grow the community around 3D imaging,       
Natalie launched the global network of      
Cappasity Service Partners which is aimed at       
making 3D imaging available to everyone. The       
Network has also become a new revenue       
stream and a scaling channel for Cappasity.       
Photographers that currently do catalog     
photography for retail clients, are using      
Cappasity 3D imaging technology to provide a       
new and unique 3D imaging service to their        
clients. Natalie is also managing the Affiliate       
program that drives Cappasity's revenue     
growth through existing users. Affiliate program      
incentivizes the most active ecosystem     
participants and leverages 'word of mouth'      
scaling, for effective and positive outreach and       
winning new customer base. 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/malshina/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/natalie-reyes-9315a989/


 

 

 

 

management. Previously participated in the     
Poppy Appeal (fundraising campaign to help the       
Armed Forces community) and HandsOn     
London (charity organization) projects as a      
volunteer. 

 

Julia Kasiyanova 
BDM 

            ​LinkedIn 

 

 
 
 

As a Business Development Manager at      
Cappasity, Julia is responsible for establishing      
and reinforcing relationships with the     
company’s key partners and clients. At the       
moment she is spearheading Cappasity’s     
growing presence in Europe as part of the        
LVMH’s program in Paris. Julia has a truly global         
outlook. Having spent her childhood years in       
India, she then moved to London to pursue a         
Master’s Degree in International Management     
from King’s College London and a Bachelor’s       
Degree in Marketing from the University of       
Greenwich. 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/juliakas/


 

 

 

 

 

Advisory 
 

 

 

Henry Ines 
Partner at DraperDragon Fund, Executive 

Director of Global Chamber® San Francisco 
LinkedIn 

 

Jeff Smith 
Entrepreneur in residence, Tech Futures 

Group 
LinkedIn 

Henry is a global executive with extensive       
venture capital, cross border advisory,     
corporate finance and entrepreneur    
experiences. As an investor, he focuses on       
FinTech/blockchain and frontier technology    
ventures based on his VC experiences as a        
partner at DraperDragon Fund, DFJ Dragon      
Fund and DragonVenture, Inc. Henry is also an        
advisor to multiple blockchain / ICOs and tech        
startups in Silicon Valley; and also continues to        
serve as a mentor for accelerators & incubators        
worldwide. Additionally, Henry oversees the     
Global Chamber® San Francisco, a member      
organization focused on cross border trade and       
investment, and also routinely lectures at      
Nanyang Technological University (NTU) in     
Singapore. Henry began his career as a       
management consultant for Fortune 500     
companies. Later, he focused on sell-side M&A       
and other corporate finance transactions     
before transitioning to direct investments.     
Henry holds a BS in Finance from Pennsylvania        
State University in University Park, PA and an        
MBA from Duke University Fuqua School of       
Business in Durham, NC. 

Jeff Smith has spent over 30 years of domestic         
and international high technology sales,     
marketing, business development, corporate    
development and venture capital experience in      
multiple industry markets. Jeff was most      
recently with RBM Technologies, a leading      
cloud based retail software company that was       
successfully sold. Prior to RBM, Jeff was the        
Founding and Managing Partner of XcelR8      
Partners that provided business development     
consulting services to accelerate revenue     
traction for early stage companies. Jeff has held        
executive positions at other software     
companies including Commerce One as VP of       
Business Development, Corporate Development    
and GM of Commerce One Ventures. Prior, he        
held leadership roles in sales, business      
development, marketing, and product line     
management at BlueCurve (acquired by Red      
Hat), Sybase, Technology Concepts (acquired by      
Bell Atlantic) and Unisys. 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/juliakas/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/juliakas/


 

 

 

 

 

Anders Larsson 
Vice President and Head of Network 

Products, Ericsson 
Co-founder LiveTourLAB 

LinkedIn 

 

Joakim Holmer 
Co-founder LiveTourLAB 

LinkedIn 

Anders has worked for two decades to create        
the emerging technologies of 2G, 3G, 4G, 5G        
and IOT in 10 different countries for Ericsson        
(NASDAQ: ERIC). Today, in 2017, there are 4.8        
billion mobile broadband and 7.7 billion mobile       
subscriptions in total, exceeding the world      
population. Anders has held various CTO roles       
and the role of Vice President and Head of         
Practice for Mobile Broadband in Southeast      
Asia & Oceania with billion dollar yearly sales        
responsibility. He holds his own patents. Since       
11 years old, Anders has loved to code. He is          
the main developer of the LiveTourLAB open       
source framework and now passionate about      
bringing VR, Crypto and Green Technology to       
same scale as telecom. 

When Joakim completed the delivery of a 500        
team member strong project, he gave a T-shirt        
to each of the 500 team members that said:         
“Everything is Possible”. This is Joakim. That       
project was the major delivery to AT&T in        
California and THE BIG ONE for Ericsson       
(NASDAQ: ERIC) that year, delivered on time,       
which everyone stated was impossible. Joakim      
Holmer joined the Ericsson Group right after       
school and it was his passion for       
communication and travel that made Ericsson      
an easy choice. The initial years as mobile        
comms software engineer were followed by 15       
years in various technical leadership positions      
around the world. Later Joakim has also worked        
with Software System Sales. With hunger to       
develop that included everything from Mobile      
App start-ups to RedHat, SAP and Cisco.       
Together with Anders he has started the next        
big venture. Let’s see where LiveTourLAB will       
take him next! 
 
 
 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/anders-larsson
https://www.linkedin.com/in/anders-larsson


 

 

 

 

 

Leo Batalov 
Partner at DLA Piper, Head of Emerging 
Growth Companies​ ​& Venture Capital 

Russia & CIS 
LinkedIn 

 

Jonathan Millet 
CEO NewsBTC 

LinkedIn 

Leo Batalov advises on corporate finance      
transactions, mergers and acquisitions, venture     
capital transactions, private equity transactions     
and general corporate matters. He also has       
broad experience representing   
issuers,underwriters, trustees and servicers in     
public and private offerings of asset-backed      
securities as well as lenders and borrowers in a         
variety  of debt finance transactions. 
 

 

Bitcoin Investor and a Hardcore crypto believer.       
Jonathan is a CEO of NewsBTC.com, one of the         
leading Bitcoin News outlets, founded in      
October 2013 with the goal of educating and        
informing those curious about the virtual      
currency that is Bitcoin. NewsBTC.com     
publishes insightful news articles, interviews     
with industry experts and extra bits of       
information to help better understand the      
Bitcoin ecosystem and share the awesome      
start-ups and projects running on Bitcoin. News       
BTC’s coverage has been mentioned in the       
major business and technology outlets like      
TechCrunch, CNN, Forbes, Business Insider, and      
others. 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/leo-batalov-445a663
https://www.linkedin.com/in/jonathan-millet-0a37179


 

 

 

 

 

Jayanand Sagar 
CTO NewsBTC 

LinkedIn 

 

Frank Holz 
Director / Member Of The Board Gawooni 

LinkedIn 

Jayanand is a seasoned Serial Entrepreneur      
with 7+ years track record of success. Crypto        
Investor and Tech Consultant, Jayanand is a       
Co-Founder of First Principles Ventures. He      
enjoys creating new products and is an expert        
in emerging technologies - blockchain and      
crypto industry are his new experimental      
grounds. Jayanand is a CTO at NewsBTC.com       
and holds deep expertise in blockchain-based      
projects and specifically Bitcoin. 
 

Frank Holz is a qualified economic engineer and        
a long serving consultant for companies such as        
Daimler-Benz, Mercedes-Benz and   
Mannesmann (today Vodafone). Since 1996     
Frank Holz has been working in the games        
industry. He was Marketing Director of      
well-known, international game publishers such     
as Infogames and Atari. In 2008 he founded IEM         
Consulting, an internationally operating    
management consultancy focusing on the     
games industry. Frank Holz advises game      
developers, game publishers, multimedia    
entrepreneurs, branded insurers, investors,    
banks and governmental agencies worldwide.     
He has a very strong strategical background and        
stable international network within the gaming      
industry. Due to his numerous consulting      
projects for governmental agencies and game      
developers in Asia, Frank Holz has a huge        
business network in Korea, Japan, Hong Kong,       
China, Taiwan, Thailand and Singapore. 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/jayanandsagar
https://www.linkedin.com/in/jayanandsagar


 

 

 

 

 

Jim Theberge 
Director, Head​ ​of Product Management & 

Sales Strategy, Advanced Advertising at 
Verizon  
LinkedIn 

 

Yu Cao 
Startup Explorer and Analyst at LVMH 

LinkedIn 

An entrepreneurial, Emmy award- winning     
Advanced TV executive consistently recognized     
for innovation and market execution. A      
successful startup veteran (six startups one IPO,       
three acquisitions) with numerous industry     
awards and firsts. First to launch a global        
connected TV advertising network with     
Samsung, Sony, Panasonic & Toshiba. 
 

Yu is working on startup sourcing at LVMH. She         
helps LVMH Group and Brands to identify and        
evaluate relevant startups for their     
businesses. She was directly involved in      
selecting startups for LVMH during Viva      
Technology 2016 & 2017. Yu holds a Master in         
Management from ESSEC business school, one      
of the best business schools in France. Yu is         
originally from China. Her bi-cultural     
background gives her a good understanding of       
European  and  Asian  digital    ecosystem. 

 
 

 

 

 

DLA Piper​, ​legal advisor 
DLA Piper is a global law firm with lawyers located in more than 40              
countries throughout the Americas, Europe, the Middle East, Africa         
and Asia Pacific, positioning us to help clients with their legal needs            
around the world 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/jim-theberge-321b159
https://www.linkedin.com/in/yu-cao-9794a528


 

 

 

 

 

 

Cappasity  Ecosystem 

How it all works: a schematic overview 
 

The AR/VR is a nascent and highly prospective field. However, the lack of quality content is a                 

serious obstacle that may put AR/VR disruptions on hold for decades. To unlock AR/VR’s              

potential, Cappasity, an established trusted player, is launching a community-friendly AR/VR           

Ecosystem which is capable of solving the AR/VR content issue. The Ecosystem is designed to               

provide its participants with engaging economic incentives to store, embed and trade            

self-created 3D and other AR/VR content. To ensure trustless content exchange among            

participants, the system relies on blockchain infrastructure, which allows users to register            

copyright. Additionally, we propose to use a proper utility token (CAPP) as the primary payment               

vehicle for all transactions within the Ecosystem.  

 

The Cappasity ecosystem is used by enterprises and ordinary users. The ecosystem encompasses             

a content storage, a decentralized copyrights storage, CAPP Wallet, Internal Exchange, API for the              

third-party developers, free utilities and modules allowing users to connect to the platform via              

websites, mobile and AR/VR applications. 

 

 Cappasity Ecosystem 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

Ecosystem participants 
 

● Developers 
App and web developers having a need for AR/VR/3D content with the purpose of app creation or                 

content integration on a website. They may also build apps based on the Cappasity platform. 

● Enterprise and SMB 
Corporations or SMBs who consume AR/VR/3D content through the Cappasity’s embedding tools.            

These customers acquire content to display it on their websites (ex. e-commerce websites or              

non-commercial online galleries) or to their own apps, or to buy ready-to-go apps from              

developers. 

● Consumers 
Anyone having a need for 3D, other AR/VR content such as 360-degree video and released apps                

for personal use. They will be active users of 3D capturing mobile app. 

 

Ecosystem key elements 

 



 

 

 

 

● Marketplace 
The Marketplace functions as a buy-and-sell area where 3D and other AR/VR content exchange              

happens among the Ecosystem community. There will be two main categories of goods: AR/VR/3D              

content and AR/VR/3D apps available in the Ecosystem’s application store. 

● Sandbox 
All content on the Marketplace can be deployed in the sandbox area before purchase. The               

sandbox has a built-in viewer for content as well as tools to test AR/VR/3D content in practice.                 

This will be invaluable for developers wishing to see how content behaves when run on different                

devices. 

● Copyright Storage on Blockchain and CAPP transactions 
Each Cappasity Token transaction between Ecosystem participants is immutably stored in the            

blockchain and cannot be reversed. Once a transaction is done, it will be processed according to a                 

smart contract protocol. Blockchain transactions will contain such facts as copyright information,            

content owner and author (if different), transfer of the rights for commercial use (if any), as well                 

as purchase and license details.  

The CAPP tokens are Cappasity’s digital asset and their main utility is the creation of a digital                 

license for the content stored on the Cappasity platform or partners’ platforms. 

The cost of one copyright record creation is equal to 1 CAPP and does not depend on the exchange                   

rate of the token. We keep track of copyrights on digital content using blockchain technology. In                

this case, one token is used to encode one 3D View or one 3D model. 

CAPP tokens enable us to encode copyrights to store them in the blockchain, this process cannot                

be done without the tokens. We will provide users with an API to validate copyrights or retrieve                 

data of a particular piece of content. 

● CAPP Wallet 
   ​Wallet for CAPP transactions. 
● Internal Exchange 

   ​Service to buy CAPP for Business clients who wants to pay with wire transfers or PayPal. 
● Software tools & SDK 
Cappasity platform software tools, SDK for AR/VR/3D content generation, embedding as well as             

data import from popular third-party utilities (Autodesk, Rhino, 3ds MAX etc.) will be available to               

the developer community. Developers will be free to build their own apps on top of it, embed 3D                  

objects and models and integrate their own products with the available tools. 

● CAPP funds for ecosystem development 
○ Cappasity Innovation Fund — an endowment providing the developer community with           
periodic grants for innovative apps. 

○ Reward Fund for Users — an endowment providing the makers of the most popular              
content with weekly rewards and encouraging active community members to moderate and            

upvote. 

 
Ecosystem goods 
There will be two main categories of goods available on the Marketplace: 

 



 

 

 

 

 

● AR/VR/3D content, namely, 3D models, 3D Views, 3D Holograms and 360-degree view            
videos. The Ecosystem will support 3D model importing in various formats such as *.OBJ / *.STL /                 

*.3DS / *.WRL / *.FBX and other popular formats. 

This content will be used by AR/VR/3D app developers, businesses, other content makers and              

artists as a basic element of a whole AR/VR app environment. A plugin for content embedding will                 

be available to content purchasers. Also general consumers may use the available content for              

personal and social VR/AR applications. 

● AR/VR/3D apps for a range of use: content creation tools for developers and content              
makers, content web-players for various devices, consumer AR/VR/3D apps for different purposes,            

e.g. entertainment, business and 3D printing. 

In order to support and promote good content, we have introduced moderation and an “upvote”               

ranking system for content and its authors. Every user can upvote any content that pleases them                

by clicking on the “thumbs-up“ button. Content makers’ ratings will be calculated as a simple sum                

of all their content’S upvotes. Top voted and demanded goods as well as the most appreciated                

creators will be listed on the Marketplace main page. 

 
 

 

 

Ecosystem structure 
 

AR/VR Ecosystem toolkits 
 

 

 

 

 

In order to keep the AR/VR/3D content creation and exchange experience smooth for all              

participants, the Cappasity Ecosystem will rely on the Cappasity technological platform with a             

variety of useful toolkits and an open API. 

 

 



 

 

 

 

For instance, Easy 3D Scan software is indispensable for mass 3D content generation. In contrast               

to complicated photogrammetry techniques, the tool can equip every person with the ability to              

easily create quality 3D content of real objects and put them up for sale. A module for 3D                  

modeling of large objects, such as buildings or landscapes, with mobile devices or drones is in the                 

platform pipeline: the software will be adapted for drone 3D shooting and will not require a lot of                  

computing power so that it will work rapidly on laptops and smartphones. 

 
The Cappasity platform supports a multitude of 3D model formats. The Cappasity platform             

formats (3D View and 3D Hologram, U.S. Patent Pending) were designed to easily share and               

embed 3D images to websites and AR/VR apps. The first one is tailored for websites and mobile                 

apps, the latter is better suited for AR/VR apps and hardware. To support the proper formats in                 

other development environments such as Unity and Unreal Engine, plugins are available for             

developers. Also imported 3D model formats can be easily converted to 3D View or 3D Hologram                

for embedding and sharing convenience. 

 
The platform will provide developers with SDK to: 

● Integrate 3D content with third-party apps and SDKs 
● Integrate 3D capturing with third-party mobile apps 
● Access 3D content from AR/VR apps 
 

The platform will provide its API to upload content to one of the databases and to access platform                  

complementary features, namely: 

○ Embedding solution ​— open-source tools and plugins for apps and web developers that             
allow them to integrate 3D View and 3D Hologram formats. 

○ Cappasity AI ​— an analytical tool for designers and marketers that analyzes customer             
interaction with 3D and provides a customer interest heatmap for each 3D image. The tool can be                 

integrated with Content Management Service​s. 
○ Remeshing solution ​— a tool for a better discrete representation of 3D model surfaces.              
Mass market devices can’t handle complex polygonal models, so polygon optimization is needed             

to run AR/VR/3D apps on such devices. On the contrary, the tool allows users to increase the                 

number of polygons to achieve a better output quality for 3D printing. 

○ 3D measurement solution ​— a tool that allows users to measure the size of an object based                 
on its 3D image. 

 
The open code of Cappasity’s embedding tool API will be available on the Cappasity github before                

the Ecosystem’s official launch. Additionally, we will provide the developer community with the             

open API of new platform features and open SDK/framework for feature extensions. Moreover,             

the code of the platform’s new features will be open sourced as soon as they are developed. 

 
On the marketplace layer, the Cappasity platform provides all account holders with the sandbox              

area. 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 
Sandbox 
The sandbox is a part of the Cappasity Ecosystem’s marketplace layer where customers can test               

AR/VR/3D content before purchasing it. It allows them to: 

● Quality check and draw content 
● Check format compatibility with different devices 
● Embed content into a website or any other system to see what it looks like. 
● Import content into an app to test the embedding plugin in the development environment. 
● Use the SDK to test integration with their own tools. 

 
Inside the Sandbox, only temporary access via link may be granted. In the case of embedding into                 

a developer environment, the Cappasity import plugin deletes the tested content upon expiration.             

The owner of the content may forbid embedding for tests, not all the content will be available in                  

the Sandbox. 

 

 

 

 

 

AR/VR Ecosystem blockchain 
 

The Ecosystem stakeholders, i.e. content creators, app developers, businesses and consumers,           

need to be ensured that their copyrights are respected. That’s why all content exchange details               

are immutably stored in the blockchain. These details form the record of transactions and the               

record of license if commercial  rights’ transfer took place. 

 
The record of transactions ​will contain the following details for each content  exchange: 
○ content hash 
○ content seller 
○ content buyer 
○ sum of transaction 
○ subscription vs. standalone 
○ rent vs. sale vs. free use 
○ expiration date for content provision (lifetime if sold). 
 
The record of license ​contains: 
○ content hash 
○ content author 
○ content owner 
○ territorial coverage: the list of countries for content distribution 
○ license type: exclusive vs. non-exclusive 

 



 

 

 

 

○ payment type: fixed price vs. royalties vs. fixed price with royalties 
○ permits for sublicensing: yes vs. no 
○ content usage: 
○ non-commercial use vs. commercial use vs. extended commercial use 
○ single-end product or multi-use product 
○ license expiration date 
 
To prevent the infringement of copyrights, each content file is assigned with an ID or a hash value.                  

The hashes of all the files submitted to the Cappasity platform are listed in the blockchain and                 

cannot be altered. A user may not upload a file that has already been submitted, as the blockchain                  

already contains a record with the hash of this file and won’t perform such operation. That means                 

that a file can be submitted only once to the platform and no one can sell anyone else’s content                   

without the author's’ consent. The exact content submission procedure is discussed in the next              

chapter. The Cappasity platform ensures that a model belonging to its author or a content owner                

won’t be sold by any other person illicitly and that the 3D content use rights won’t be infringed on. 

 
Due to the fact that each piece of content is assigned with a hash, the content owner receives                  

payments for each transaction. All standalone and subscription purchases as well as free content 

are regulated by the smart contract that grants access to the content. It also regulates application                

downloads and 360-degree video viewing. In the case of a content rental, the link will expire at the                  

end of the period listed in the rental contract. In the case of temporary-available free content or                 

content sale term changes, the corresponding amendments are to be registered in the             

blockchain and the relevant smart contract activated. 

Smart-contract code example for granting access to the content. 
 

function has PermissionToGetContent(bytes32 _contentID) public view 

returns (bool _hasPermission) { 

_hasPermission = false; 

 
bool allowedByLicense = false; 

 if (licensePurchases[_contentID][msg.sender].is Value) { 

allowedByLicense = 
(licensePurchases[_contentID][msg.sender].isLifetime) || 
(licensePurchases[_contentID][msg.sender].expirationDate    >  now); 

} 

 
bool freePeriodApplies = false; 

if (freePeriods[_contentID].isValue) {  

freePeriodApplies = 
(freePeriods[_contentID].startingDate < now) && 
 (now < freePeriods[_contentID].endingDate); 

} 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 
_hasPermission = 

(content[_contentID].owner == msg.sender) ||  

allowedByLicense || 
freePeriodApplies; 

} 
 

This is a simplified version of the code for demonstrative purposes, the actual 
implementation may and will differ from this illustration. 

 

AR/VR/3D Ecosystem will be built on Ethereum platform as a set of smart-contracts. Ethereum is a                

blockchain that supports Turing-complete smart-contracts. Smart-contracts will track license         

purchases and cover all the aspects mentioned above in respect to copyrights’ protection. All the               

content exchange details will be stored in Ethereum blockchain and therefore approved by             

Ethereum miners. We picked Ethereum for several reasons. It has smart-contracts to support the              

behaviour we want from our blockchain ecosystem. It's fast enough for our requirements and it's               

reliable. 

 

Marketplace economy 

 

The Ecosystem economy is designed to be driven by the market. Thus, the Marketplace is the key                 

economic unit where goods turnover occurs. Using the Marketplace, participants are free to rent,              

sell and buy AR/VR/3D content as well as released apps. Below we describe the scope of                

Marketplace functionalities as well as the types of economic relationships within the community. 

 
Content listing 
Artists, developers, designers — basically anyone with AR/VR/3D content — are free to create a               

personal or business account on the Cappasity’s Ecosystem platform. Once the content is             

uploaded to the platform, the content maker is able to choose ​a status ​for each piece of  content: 
● Public — the content is visible on the content maker’s  account 
➢ Listed on the Marketplace — the content becomes available for purchase 
➢ Unlisted — the content is only on the account, but sharing and embedding option is               

available. This is the case for not-for-profit content display. 

● Private — the content prohibited from sale or use and is solely available to its owner, who 
can store the content for personal purposes. 

 
As for all public content pieces listed on the Marketplace, a content maker is free to choose one of                   

two ​listed mode ​options corresponding to one of two ​content categories​: 
● “Standalone listing” mode for the exclusive content category: the content maker may set 
the price for each piece. 

● “Listing in subscription” mode for the regular content category: the price is set by the 
Marketplace. 

 



 

 

 

 

 
Besides the difference in pricing, each content category will have different terms of moderation.              

To protect the content from piracy, computer vision algorithms will be utilized to find potential               

copyright infringement. The similarity value threshold is set higher for the exclusive category than              

for the regular one. 

 
Content makers can also choose how their content is going to be traded. Several economic types                

are available: 

● Renting content, 
● Selling content, 
● Transferring commercial use of rights with various licensing options, 
● Apply for tender calls 
 
Along with that a content maker may take part in calls for tender hold on the Marketplace, where                  

customers will encourage content makers to compete for orders by price and quality. 

 
For all traded content in the Ecosystem, the fact of payment for the content, as well as the                  

deadline for the rental term, is fixed in the blockchain. The execution terms are guaranteed by                

smart contracts. 

 

Renting content 
When rented, content is accessed by the customer via temporary link and cannot be cached for                

development or downloaded. The link will expire once the lending period is over. The link to the                 

model may be embedded into the customer’s website or mobile apps making it a good option for                 

e-commerce catalogues, seasonal expositions or advertisement cases. The content maker gets           

paid on a monthly basis. 

 

Selling content 
When sold, content is provided to a customer either via link or as a file; the customer chooses.                  

Content sale doesn’t imply exclusive sale, so one and the same content may be sold to different                 

customers. To complete the purchase, a lump-sum payment is required. Content sale is             

well-suited for permanent exposition of goods or artwork, and app development in gaming and              

other fields. 

 
 

Transfer of commercial use rights 
Transfer of rights implies a change of content ownership, tough the blockchain keeps the              

information about author forever. Separation of authorship from ownership allows ​original           
content makers to continue collecting upvotes and leave the content in their personal portfolio.              

Meanwhile, the owner is authorized to trade the content and to enjoy revenue. 

 

Call for tender 

 



 

 

 

 

The Marketplace will allow community members to place orders for AR/VR/3D content and             

applications and invite content makers to participate. For instance, a call for tender may contain               

a description of a 3D model wanted, its format and specs, price range and submission deadline.                

Content makers are free to set the price for their work, show their portfolio of previous creations                 

and discuss details. Once the customer is satisfied with the terms of one of the bidders, the deal                  

is closed. The transaction takes place when the content is ready. Orders can be placed not only                 

for the 3D models and images, but also for any other types of content traded on the Marketplace                  

such as AR/VR/3D apps or 360-degree videos. 

 
Marketplace revenue distribution 
Not all revenue from content exchange is given to the content maker. A share of it is allocated to                   

nurture supporting infrastructure as a transaction fee. The size of the fee is not fixed and serves                 

as an economic incentive to promote good quality content and encourage diligent content             

makers. 

The Marketplace content ranking system affects the profit received by a content maker. Thus,              

every user is assigned with a score in such a way that a content maker’s royalty lies between                  

85-95%, starting at 90% 

 

Smart-contract code example for royalty rate after moderation reports. 
 

function punishForInappropriateContent(address _author) internal { 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 
This is a simplified version of the code for demonstrative purposes, the actual implementation may and will differ 
from this illustration. 

A content maker’s rating is affected positively based on: 
 

● The number of upvotes received 
● Correct moderation of others’ content (correct reporting increases the score) 
 
A content maker’s rating decreases when: 
● The maker’s content is reported as inappropriate and deleted. 
● False complaints on the others’ content and report retractions during moderation are 

 



 

 

 

 

discovered. 

 
The fees are distributed among a daily fund and databases, a.k.a storage service providers. Fees               

for storage service are equal to 2%. The databases are rated as well; the exact fees depend on                  

their rating. 

 

A content seller: 85-95% depending on personal rating. Starts at 90%. The retained fee from the 

content sale is allocated to *: 

● Storage service. 2% of content monthly turnover is collected and allocated among 
databases. The exact remuneration amount that a database receives depends on its technical 

specifications and behavior. 

● The remaining 3-13% goes to the Daily Fund. Starts at 8%. 
 

Smart-contract code example for royalty rate depending on personal rating. 
 

function send Token Payment (address _recepient, uint _tokens) internal { 

require(tokenContract.allowance(msg.sender, address(this)) >= _tokens); 

require(tokenContract.balanceOf(msg.sender) >= _tokens); 

uint royalty = accounts[_recepient].rating / 1000; 

 
uint tokensToOwner = _tokens * royalty / 100; 

uint tokensToStorageFund = _tokens * 2 / 100; 

uint tokensToDailyFund = _tokens * (95-royalty) / 100; 

tokenContract.transferFrom(msg.sender, _recepient, tokensToOwner); 

tokenContract.transferFrom(msg.sender, storageFund, tokensToStorageFund); 

tokenContract.transferFrom(msg.sender, dailyFund, tokensToDailyFund); 

 
PaymentProcessed(msg.sender, _recepient, _tokens, tokensToOwner, 

tokensToStorageFund, tokensToDailyFund); 
 

This is a simplified version of the code for demonstrative purposes, the actual implementation may and will differ from this illustration. 

The Daily Fund is filled with the fee from daily transactions and is spent on: 

● Rewards for senior moderators 
● Rewards for reports that lead to the content deletion 
● Rewards for socially important achievements such as: 
- Moderation: 10 reported pieces of content confirmed inappropriate and deleted 

- Content sale: content maker achieved maximum royalty rate 
- Storage: holding a database for more than a year or 100TB of traffic having gone through 

the database. 

 

 

 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Cappasity ecosystem use-cases 

Gaming: 3D model sale for videogames 
2025 videogame AR/VR market estimation by Goldman Sachs: 

216m users and $11.6bn AR/VR software market 
 

A team of video game developers is looking for 3D content compatible with different VR hardware                

for their VR game. To stun and engage gamers, the team plans to create real-world industrial                

holograms and 3D models. To speed up the game’s release, a technical designer goes to the                

Ecosystem Marketplace and searches for relevant content. They pay for a subscription and buy a               

bunch of industrial 3D holograms, generated with the open source Cappasity 3D capture module              

for drones. Also they choose a 3D model and test it in the sandbox area via the link. During the                    

test period the technical designer uses the plugin to display the model on different devices. Once                

tested, they complete the purchase. As a result, the developer gets the opportunity to download               

the purchased model in the relevant format and use it in their development framework. The smart                

contract protocol allocates the revenue among the 3D hologram makers and transfers the funds              

to the 3D model makers. The developers obtain the files with the model and holograms. Once                

programmed, the video game is ready for production  release. 
 

Live events: 360-degree video call for tender 

2025 live events AR/VR market estimation by Goldman Sachs: 95m 

users and $4.1bn software market 
 

A video production and PR company provides services to many clients hungry for hot and fresh                

content including cable-TV broadcasters, travel agencies and on-demand streaming services. It           

joins the Cappasity Ecosystem to place calls for a tender for 360-degree videos on different topics:                

erotic home 360-degree videos, safari park 360-degree videos, rock festival 360-degree videos.            

Content makers from different corners of the globe send their proposals and links to their               

portfolios to negotiate the terms. The bidding party is ready to license the rights for commercial                

use from the content makers. Once the content makers are selected, the money is frozen on the                 

customer account and sent to the makers when the task is submitted. The customer evaluates the                

video quality. After the purchase, the production company is authorized to resell the content to its                

clients. It sells erotic home 360-degree video to cable TV broadcasters, safari video from South               

Africa to travel agencies and live rock festival footage to streaming services. The spectators enjoy               

never- before-seen content with VR glasses. 

 

Video entertainment: 3D graphics for consumer AR app 

2025 video entertainment AR/VR market estimations by Goldman Sachs: 79m users 

and $3.2bn software market 
 

 



 

 

 

 

 

A consumer AR app developer submits its product to the Marketplace application store. The app               

superimposes animated 3D graphics over a user videostream. The monetization model is            

freemium: users can select to display a free AR image or pay for the ability to display exclusive AR                   

images. The demand for images is not predictable: the developer has to do lots of market study                 

and tests in order to achieve a sustainable profit. To shorten filter time-to-market and              

development iterations, the developer pays for a short-term rental of 3D images, embeds them              

into its app via the Cappasity platform SDK and measures conversion rates of installs and               

payments. The developer drops unwanted content and keeps the most popular images,            

purchasing them from the content owner. Thus, the developer’s revenue grows while a prudent              

balance between variable and fixed costs is maintained. Meanwhile, users enjoy abundant            

entertaining content. 
 

Retail: virtual 3D exhibition, VIP showrooms, social e-commerce 
2025 retail AR/VR market estimation by Goldman Sachs: 32mn 

users and $1.6bn software market 
 

3D content rental for online art auction 
An art auction agency launches an online auction of valuable sculptures. To promote the event it                

announces a virtual exhibition of thematic pieces of art. The agency’s system administrator uses              

Easy 3D Scan Cappasity software to generate 3D images of the sculptures for sale and surfs the                 

art section of the Marketplace to find the necessary content submitted by academies of fine arts                

for seasonal rental. Then, they embed the objects into the agency’s online gallery. The auction               

prospects enjoy viewing the exhibition and the sculptures for sale in 3D view format, which               

allows rotation, zooming and viewing on the agency’s website directly. Along with the sculptures,              

the agency may sell the rights for commercial use of sculptures’ 3D models or may list them on                  

the Marketplace and accrue passive income. 

 

AR/VR VIP showroom 
A famous Swiss watch brand discovers a new way to showcase its collection of luxury models to                 

VIP clients. It invites a high-ranked content maker to prepare 3D holograms of the collection and                

submit them to the Cappasity Ecosystem for private use only. Then it sends its representative to                

a VIP client location with AR headsets Microsoft Hololens, for example. The client enjoys seeing               

various models right in front of them and chooses their favorite model with ease. 

 

Social e-commerce 
A professional cyclist used to place their obsolete equipment to eBay for sale, but it is annoying                 

for them to reply to redundant customer requests for equipment condition details. So, they join               

the Cappasity AR/VR Ecosystem to make a 3D View of their professional equipment. They              

download a 3D Scan mobile app to digitize the equipment and then embed the link in their eBay                  

account and several other Marketplaces to display a detailed 3D image of her equipement. Now,               

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

all the details of the equipment are clearly available to purchasers: They can zoom and rotate the                 

object. Therefore, sales require less communication and happen faster. 
 

3D printing: 3D models for medical students 

2025 education and healthcare AR/VR markets estimation by Goldman Sachs: 18.4mn users 

and $5.8bn software market 

 

A bioengineering lab engineers 3D printed hearts, lungs, brains, and livers. The artificial organs              

are made from soft materials that look so lifelike they even bleed. The lab joins the Cappasity                 

Ecosystem to sell the 3D printed models stored as 3MF (3D Manufacturing Format) files to               

medical schools and university hospitals. The more 3D printing spreads in healthcare, the more              

medical labs become equipped with their own 3D printers and need ready-to-print models for              

medical training. Medical students can watch surgeries on a monitor while practicing along on              

their own 3D printed model. Afterward, surgeons and students are able to compare what they               

removed from the organ. Meanwhile, the bioengineering lab is able to release model updates              

and profit from the market. 

 

Social VR: 3D avatar for sharing and fashion 

2025 total addressable AR/VR market estimation by Goldman Sachs: 

$80bn with 60​% ​of VR/AR software revenue driven by the consumer (vs. enterprise/public sector) 
 

An actress makes a 3D model of herself and places it on the Cappasity Ecosystem to share with                  

friends and publish on social networks. As her 3D figure becomes publicly available, she gets               

requests from fashion brands and designers to rent her figure for virtual fashion shows and               

showrooms. She lists her hologram on the marketplace in the exclusive content category and sets               

the rental price. Fashion customers embed her hologram into their AR/VR applications and pay              

monthly rent to the content owner. 

 

   

 



 

 

 

 

 
Ecosystem content moderation 

 

3D content submission and moderation system 
 

 

 

   

   

To ensure appropriateness of the content and eliminate copyright infringements, steadily data            
curation and monitoring is needed. To filter out defective objects at submission stage, the              
automatic curation will be carried out by the ​Content submission system​. This will allow the system                
to avoid damaged content such as: 
● Total copies of already uploaded content to the database 
● Mismatched format of content 
● Broken file 
● Offensive content 
 
As for content submitted to the Cappasity platform, it is a subject to two steps of manual                 

moderation. The first step relies on users who sent complaints. Complaints may made about: * 

● Unwanted content 
● Copyright infringement (with proof), 
● Content descriptions that don’t match the content, 
● Misplaced tags. 
 
   

 



 

 

 

 

Smart-contract code example for content moderation. 

struct ​ContentDeletionVote { bool 
hasVoted; 
bool votedToDelete; 

} 

 
struct ContentDeletionVoteBooth { 

// The number of potential voters is small, so arrays can be used 
// safely, without the risk of running out of gas 
address[] assignedModerators; 
mapping (address => ContentDeletionVote) castVotes; 
uint totalVotesCast; 
uint startingDate; uint 
expirationDate; bool 
resolved; 
bool isValue; 

} 
mapping (bytes32 => ContentDeletionVoteBooth) contentDeletionVotes; 
function maybeAdvanceContentReporting(bytes32 _contentID) internal { 

uint authorsRating = accounts[content[_contentID].author].rating; 
uint threshold = MIN_REPORTS_TO_INIT_VOTING + (authorsRating^2) / 10000; 
if (content[_contentID].totalReports >= threshold) { 

// Check that the moderation voting hasn't been launched already 
require(!contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].isValue); 
// Launch voting 
contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].startingDate = now; 
contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].expirationDate = now + MODERATION_VOTING_TIME; 
contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].isValue = true; 
assignRandomModeratorsForContentRemoval(_contentID); 

} 

} 
This is a simplified version of the code for demonstrative purposes, the actual implementation may and will differ from this illustration. 

 

The second step involves a small number of moderators, appointed by trusted community             

members with high rank and high report hit rate.* Content with a high number of complaint                

reports comes to them. The second group of moderators makes a final decision about whether               

delete content or decline a complaint. The latter is followed by lowering the rank of the reporters                 

who misplaced the complaint. 

The required number of reports to send the issue to the second group of moderators isn’t fixed.                 

For the content to be deleted, content makers who have many upvotes will need a higher number                 

of reports than a freshly made account, since new accounts don’t have any record of content                

quality. The minimum required number of complaint reports is determined by the sum of upvotes               

of a content maker. 

(the bottom brackets indicate rounding down). 
 

 



 

 

 

 

Smart-contract code example for content moderation based on number of moderators. 

function voteForContentDeletion(bytes32 _contentID, bool _vote) public { 
require(contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].isValue); 
// Make sure the voting period hasn't ended 
require(contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].expirationDate > now); 
// Make sure the voter has been selected for this particular vote 
require(isInAddressArray(msg.sender, 

contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].assignedModerators)); 

// Make sure the voter hasn't already voted 
require(!contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].castVotes[msg.sender].hasVoted); 

 
contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].castVotes[msg.sender].hasVoted = true; 
contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].castVotes[msg.sender].votedToDelete = _vote; 
contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].totalVotesCast += 1; 

 

VoteCast(_contentID, _vote); 
} 

 

function punishModeratorForIdling(address _moderator) internal { 
// Decrease rating, but not below the threshold of 85% royalties 
accounts[_moderator].rating = max(accounts[_moderator].rating - 30, 8500); 

} 

 
function resolveContentDeletionVote(bytes32 _contentID) internal { 

require(contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].isValue); 
// Make sure the vote hasn't already been resolved 
require(!contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].resolved); 
// Voting can only be resolved when every vote is cast or it has expired 
require((contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].assignedModerators.length == 

contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].totalVotesCast) || 

(now > contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].expirationDate)); 

 
uint votesToDelete = 0; 

uint votesToKeep = 0; 
address _moderator; 
for (uint i=0; i<contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].assignedModerators.length; i++) { 

_moderator = contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].assignedModerators[i]; 
// If the moderator has voted, count the vote 
if    (contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].castVotes[_moderator].hasVoted)   { 

if (contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].castVotes[_moderator].votedToDelete) 
votesToDelete += 1; 

else votesToKeep += 1; 

// Otherwise punish the ​moderator ​for skipping on a vote 
} else punishModeratorForIdling(_moderator); 

} 
 

 



 

 

 

 

 bool voteResultedInDeletion = votesToDelete > 
votesToKeep; if (voteResultedInDeletion) { 

punishForInappropriateContent(content[_contentID].author); 
removeContent(_contentID); 
rewardReporters(_contentID); 

} else { 
punishReporters(_contentID); 
clearReportersList(_contentID); 

} 

 

contentDeletionVotes[_contentID].resolved = true; 
VoteResolved(_contentID, voteResultedInDeletion); 

} 
 

This is a simplified version of the code for demonstrative purposes, the actual implementation may and will differ 
from this illustration. 

 

This dependence increases the threshold sum of report points from 10 to 20 when a content                

maker’s rating reaches 1000 upvotes (the sum of the “likes” for all of their content), and to 110                  

report points with the 10,000 upvotes respectively. The above logic is hardcoded in the voting               

smart contract protocol, that executes the calculation of user reports and complaints and             

performs a content deletion, if required. 

Report points required to send the issue 

 

1000 

 

500 

 

 

 

 

100 

 

50 

 

 

 

 

 

10                            10   

1  

   

 

100 

User’s upvotes 

   

 

1000                  10000 

 

   

 



 

 

 

 

  

Cappasity Token (CAPP) 
Cappasity utility currency 
 

The platform uses blockchain infrastructure to store and manage 3D digital assets copyrights.  

CAPP token is issued both to store the digital asset copyrights and as a payment solution for the                  

Cappasity ecosystem. Cappasity token is issued as ERC-20 Ethereum token. All CAPP transactions             

is handled by Ethereum blockchain and therefore approved by Ethereum miners.  

 

The cost of one copyright record creation is equal to 1 CAPP and does not depend on the exchange                   

rate of the token. We keep track of copyrights on digital content using blockchain technology. In                

this case, one token is used to encode one 3D View or one 3D model. 

 

CAPP tokens enable us to encode copyrights to store them in the blockchain, this process cannot                

be done without the tokens. We will provide users with an API to validate copyrights or retrieve                 

data of a particular piece of content. 

 

DEVELOPERS OF APPLICATIONS BASED ON UNITY OR OTHER ENGINES 

Developers that use content in their applications via the Cappasity plugins can utilize our              

technology for free, but they have to create copyright records for the content stored on their                

accounts. For instance, if a developer produces a VR store with a thousand objects, they shall use                 

1000 CAPP to get the necessary licenses. In this case, we guarantee that the content will not be                  

used in any other application since the plugin validates the data before the app is prepared to be                  

released. Developers, for their part, voluntarily confirm that they have all the necessary rights on               

the created content. 

 

HOW TO PURCHASE TOKENS? 

We will provide users with an internal exchange that helps to purchase tokens in a convenient way                 

to use them only within the platform. The tokens are also available on KuCoin and Cryptopia. 

 

WHAT ELSE ARE THE CAPP TOKENS USED FOR? 

Users need tokens to rent and buy content and services within the platform. In addition, the                

tokens are used to support the third-party developers via the grants fund – the Cappasity               

Innovation Fund. 

 
 

Cappasity  endowment funds 

 



 

 

 

 

 
To favor the AR/VR/3D community, two endowment entities are established: ​The Cappasity            
Innovation Fund ​and ​Reward Fund​. Upon a successful token sale 20% of raised funds will be                
dedicated to the former and 10% will be allocated to the latter. 

 

Cappasity Innovation Fund 
A dedicated fund for AR/VR/3D app developers and innovators is going to incentivize the              

developers of the best AR/VR/3D applications submitted to the Ecosystem for further release             

more high-quality products. Within five years of the Cappasity Ecosystem launch, the Cappasity             

Token remuneration is to be paid to developers. No binding terms are foreseen: developers will               

own their IP and will be free to publish or commercialize the apps and tools as they wish. The                   

grant sizes and number of winners will depend on the remaining funds, nominee enrollment will               

be open all year round with no deadlines set. 

 
Reward Fund 
A dedicated fund for the development and support of the AR/VR/3D community. The most active               

content creators and contributors will be rewarded systematically. It will sponsor such            

competitions as a sculpting challenge, landscape parts, and best tutorial. 

 
Stimulating prizes and rewards ares to be paid in CAPPs. Awardees may spend these utility               

tokens on AR/VR/3D content and services listed on the marketplace. Moreover, these incentive             

measures will engage new Ecosystem participants and foster increasing Cappasity Token           

turnover. 

 

  

 



 

 

 

 

Milestone roadmap 
 

 

2013​ ​Cappasity Inc. is founded 
2014​ ​R&D of easy 3D content production 
2016​ ​Free 3D digitizing software Easy 3D Scan®to create 3D Views: 10x faster 3D content 
production 

2017​ ​Cappasity Platform launch: 4x faster browsing from any type of device proprietary 3D 
format.  Easy embedding – manual or API. 

 

Latest version of 2018 roadmap: 

 

https://trello.com/b/z4OZeLKW/cappasity-roadmap 

 

 
 

 

 

 

Conclusion 

Today, we can see the shortage of compelling content that is slowing the dissemination of 3D and                 

further technology development. Content makers lack convenient tools and a supportive content            

distribution environment. Moreover, artists cannot be fully confident that their copyrights will            

not be violated. 

 

Cappasity is initiating a global ecosystem of 3D services through the establishment of a new               

cooperative model. To guarantee copyrights and ecosystem marketplace purity, Cappasity          

3D/AR/VR Ecosystem is applying blockchain technology. This approach ensures decentralized and           

trustless exchange of creative content and copyright storage. 

 

Cappasity will devote its experience and technology to bringing the AR/VR Ecosystem into the              

world. As a company, we have already made 3D digitizing and embedding easier, faster and more                

scalable than could have been imagined a couple of years ago.  

 

  

 

https://trello.com/b/z4OZeLKW/cappasity-roadmap


 

 

 

 

 

 
Appendices 

AR/VR hardware, software and content 
 

Augmented Reality 
AR hardware evolves in several categories: Mobile AR hardware, tethered smartglasses and            

standalone smartglasses​56​. The first category is represented by dedicated smartphone/tablet AR           
systems like Google Tango, launched in late 2016. The system capabilities are well-suited for              

entertainment purposes, but that’s not all. The Gap, a clothing brand, built a Tango app that lets                 

you try on clothes without going to the store​57​. The installed base in the next 12 months of the                   
AR phone could amount to tens of millions.​58 ​At the same time, Apple is making an attempt to                  
bring AR even closer to consumers by incorporating AR software into their platforms. The new               

iPhone 8 is rumored to be equipped with a 3D laser for AR and autofocus: a 3D sensing camera                   

will enable extremely accurate depth mapping for AR applications​59​. These rumors are preceded             
by the recent summer announcement of ARKit for iOS, the tool that let app developers draw on                 

detailed camera and sensor data to map digital objects into 3D space with no heavy engineering                

skills required​60​. 
 
Other tech giants including Facebook with its Camera Effects Platform see many applications of              

mobile AR software as well, such as: AR in messengers (Tencent, SnapChat, LINE, Kakao and               

Snow), AR in maps (Google and Baidu), AR in e-commerce (Alibaba, Amazon and eBay). After               

its sudden breakthrough in 2016 with the unprecedented success of ​Pokémon Go ​(in less than               
a year it has been downloaded 700 million times), Mobile AR is expected to gain over a billion                  

users by 2021​61​. 
 
AR is generally associated with smartglasses which are expected to conquer the mass consumer              

market and replace smartphones in the next ten years​62​. Tethered smartglasses are a solution to               
avoid such challenges as limited battery life. They require a smartphone/tablet or PC host like               

Meta smartglasses, an upcoming gamechanger in workspace environments​63​. Standalone AR          
smartglasses, devices with no host, like Google Glass and Microsoft HoloLens, are evolving as              

well by extending battery life and improving hardware. Once abandoned, the first series of              

consumer-oriented Google Glass, has been recently announced to be reincarnated in the            

enterprise edition, Google Glass EE. Unlike the standalone HoloLens, Glasses can be attached to a               

regular pair of glasses or goggles and serve as a peripheral accessory to a smartphone. Media                

reports say that the product is already in the production phase and will be of use for the                  

agricultural machinery manufacturing industry, healthcare, and logistics with DHL​64​. From the           
very beginning, Microsoft HoloLens has been focusing on the enterprise market as well. Starting              

its first shipments in March 2016​65​, the company supplies their mixed reality glasses to NASA, the                
US military, the healthcare and entertainment industries, as well as the education sector and              

 



 

 

 

 

more​66​. 
 
Virtual Reality 
Hardware producers are working in two directions: improving quality and introducing mass            

market solutions, and creating several price segments. Thus, today VR hardware can be divided              

into three categories depending on price and performance: specialist, enthusiast, and explorer​67​. 
 
In 2017, Facebook’s Oculus Rift and HTC revolutionized the hardware industry with their high              

quality immersive products​68​. Oculus Rift, a Kickstarter project in its past, is currently being              
developed by one of the brightest minds in VR – John Carmack, the co-creator of Doom and                 

prominent video programmer. HTC Vive is the result of a tight collaboration between top-tech              

hardware producer HTC on the infrastructure side and gaming guru-company Valve on the             

software side. Both products are accompanied by touch controllers to provide a truly             

immersive experience. The main concern in this case is the processing power of the computer on                

which the products run, as some applications may require high processing capacity and won’t run               

well on less powerful devices. And the price is well above $1,000, making them unaffordable to                

the general public. The high prices and requirements of the products developed by Facebook and               

HTC are likely to put them in narrow “specialist” category. 

 
VR “enthusiasts” may enjoy the price and performance of Sony’s PS and Microsoft’s upcoming              

Windows 10 VR. The fact that the Microsoft product doesn’t require a high- performance PC to                

run it, combined with the price and inside-out tracking inherited from Hololens, makes it              

attractive to consumers. The prevailing installed base for the “explorer” category is Mobile VR.              

The launch of Daydream View refined the consumer mobile VR experience, while keeping it              

affordable for the mass consumer, thus replacing Google Cardboard. Samsung marketed its            

product Gear VR as low as $100 and exceeded their anticipated sale plan. 

 

Difference between project & actual number of shipments x thousands (2016) 
Source: SuperData Research 

 

   
 

 



 

 

 

 

VR devices differ in characteristics, and therefore require different implementation approaches.           

Sony’s Playstation VR, Oculus Rift and HTC Vive are focused on the gaming industry, whereas               

Samsung Gear VR due to the limited device power is seen as “VR-lite,” mainly for entertainment.                

The VR hardware race promises that we may soon see affordable products that don’t compromise               

on quality. 

 
To win the competition, equipment producers have built developer ecosystems that are specific to              

their products. Oculus Rift opens opportunities for third-party developers and offers a wide range              

of already functioning system content. HTC Vive has integrated the use of Steam VR and Valve’s                

VR game platform and announced a 

$100 m investment fund, alongside its Vive X accelerator program​69​. The content for Sony PS VR is                 
strongly related to the PS4 gaming system and is developed in a closed environment. 

 

 

AR/VR content 
There is a variety of content types and content generation techniques for augmented and virtual               

reality. When mentioning AR/VR content we may refer to one of the following categories: 

● 3D content, which exists in form of 3D models or 3D images, with a wide range of uses 
● Apps that can be run on AR/VR hardware 
● 360-degree video, with the main application in the live event transmission 
 
The primary use of AR/VR content is gaming. However, available game engines meeting the              

requirements of other industries are in high demand. The main elements of any game engine are                

animation, interaction, lighting, physics and presence​70 ​which also make it suitable for the             
e-commerce and engineering industries. The leading role in software is occupied by the Unity and               

Unreal game engines. The majority of AR/VR projects are created on Unity (as much as two thirds                 

according to techcrunch.com).​71 ​72 ​Unreal engine isn’t far behind. At WWDC 2017 it was              
announced that Unreal Engine will provide early access support for ARKit, which opens an              

enormous new market for game  engines.​73 
 
Gaming studios, software and app developers and other industries entering the AR/VR space are              

highly dependent on a different kind of 3D content. 3D objects lie at the core of AR/VR                 

applications. There are several approaches to creating them. The most common way to create a               

3D model is to use 3D editor software. This type of 3D content is called a computer generated (CG)                   

model. One of the most popular softwares for that purpose is Blender. It is free of charge,                 

open-source and has an enormous number of design tools. Besides AR/VR applications, computer             

generated 3D models are widely used in 3D printing (3DP), which was estimated to have a market                 

of $6.5 bn value in 2016​74​. 3DP is gaining supporters and has already been applied in many                 
different industries: from automotive manufacturing to healthcare. In healthcare it can have a             

huge impact and is expected to become common practice in a wide range of cases.​75 ​It can also be                   
used for personal purposes: a user may print a missing drone part or an iPhone case. 

 



 

 

 

 

 
When the goal is to create a lifelike object, CG modeling can be replaced with photogrammetry.                

Photogrammetry is a method used to create a 3D model by combining several images of a real                 

object and determining the exact position of the surface points. Unity considers photogrammetry             

a valuable tool to produce realistic, high-quality, reusable, game-ready digital assets and offers             

photogrammetry solutions to bring realism to the gaming experience. ​76 
 
3D models are perfectly suited to 3DP and gaming environments. However, they contain a lot of                

data such as geometry validation, annotations and metadata​77​. This limits usage opportunities:            
such models may not perform well on mobile device with limited processing power; they are too                

cumbersome for web browsers. So, in order to enhance user experience and meet the demands of                

other industries such as e- commerce, where lightweight formats are of value, a 3D image format                

was invented. It contains only the necessary minimum of information for displaying an object in a                

web browser. 3D images make the online shopping experience more interactive​78 ​and don’t             
require high processing power. 

 
Not only are 3D objects of value for AR/VR, but also VR cannot be imagined now without                 

360-degree video production​79​. It is recorded using multiple cameras with overlapping fields of             
view. The produced footage is merged together into one piece using a video stitching method.               

Every piece is calibrated to match the others. 360- degree videos are used to record live events for                  

even more immersive experience. This format is also perfectly suited for virtual tours making them               

even more realistic. 

 

   

 



 

 

 

 

 
Bibliography 
 

1​ ​https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yJBoXQNVX3Q​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
2 ​Ermitanio M. VR funding and innovation look strong for 2017. 
https://venturebeat.com/2017/01/10/vr-funding-and-innovation-look-strong-for-2017/​, ​2017, accessed 17 
Aug. 2017. 
3 ​Lintern G. Transfer of Landing Skill after Training with Supplementary Visual Cues. 
https://doi.org/10.1177/001872088002200109​, ​1980, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
4 ​https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/1523379957/oculus-rift-step-into-the-game​, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017 
5 ​Rouse M. VUCA (Volatility, Uncertainty, Complexity and Ambiguity) 
http://whatis.techtarget.com/definition/VUCA-volatility-uncertainty-complexity-and-​ ​ambiguity​ ​2017, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
6 ​http://www.sleepnomorenyc.com/#share​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
7 ​Hughes K. Beyond Broadway: Why Everyone's Trying Immersive Theater. 
http://www.cntraveler.com/stories/2016-04-01/beyond-broadway-why-everyones-trying- 
immersive-theater​, 2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
8 ​McCarthy Caty, Immersive theater is coming soon to a virtual reality headset near you. 
https://killscreen.com/versions/immersive-theater-coming-soon-virtual-reality-headset-near/​,​ ​accessed 17 
Aug. 2017. 
9 ​Participatory culture. ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Participatory_culture​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
10 ​Bavor C. Virtual and Augmented Realities: Asking the right questions and traveling the path ​ahead. 
https://medium.com/@claybavor/virtual-and-augmented-realities-asking-the-right- 
questions-and-traveling-the-path-ahead-2428b9d13c01​, 2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
11               ​http://www.independent.co.uk/life-style/gadgets-and-tech/features/apple-tim-cook-boss- 
brexit-uk-theresa-may-number-10-interview-ustwo-a7574086.html​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
12 ​Worldwide Spending on Augmented and Virtual Reality Expected to Double or More Every Year Through 

2021, According to IDC. ​https://www.idc.com/getdoc.jsp?containerId=prUS42959717​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 
2017.​https://www.idc.com/getdoc.jsp?containerId=prUS42959717 
13 ​After mixed year, mobile AR to drive $108 billion VR/AR market by 2021. http​://www.digi- 
capital.com/news/2017/01/after-mixed-year-mobile-ar-to-drive-108-billion-vrar-market-by- 
2021/#.WY2an9OGPdS​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
14 ​Record $2.3 billion VR/AR investment in 2016. ​http://www.digi- 
capital.com/news/2017/02/record-2-3-billion-vrar-investment-in-2016/#.WY2h7dOGPdQ​,​ accessed 17 Aug. 
2017 
15 ​Citi GPS: Global Perspectives & Solutions. Virtual and augmented reality: Are you sure it isn’t real? 
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-​ ​augmented-reality.pdf​, 2016, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
16 ​Tackle S. The Size Of The VR Consumer Market (Updated, 3rd March). 
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/asia/feature/63914/the-size-of-the-vr-consumer-market-​ ​updated/​, ​2017, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
17 ​Virtual Reality Market and Consumers. ​https://www.superdataresearch.com/market- 
data/virtual-reality-industry-report/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
18 ​Goldman Sachs Equity Research. Virtual & Augmented Reality. 
http://www.goldmansachs.com/our-thinking/pages/technology-driving-innovation- 
folder/virtual-and-augmented-reality/report.pdf​, ​2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
19 ​http://www.sothebysrealty.com/eng/virtual-reality​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017 
20 ​Ford's Virtual Reality Lab Revolutionizes Vehicle Design Process. 

 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yJBoXQNVX3Q
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yJBoXQNVX3Q
https://venturebeat.com/2017/01/10/vr-funding-and-innovation-look-strong-for-2017/
https://venturebeat.com/2017/01/10/vr-funding-and-innovation-look-strong-for-2017/
https://doi.org/10.1177/001872088002200109
https://doi.org/10.1177/001872088002200109
https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/1523379957/oculus-rift-step-into-the-game
https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/1523379957/oculus-rift-step-into-the-game
http://whatis.techtarget.com/definition/VUCA-volatility-uncertainty-complexity-and-ambiguity
http://whatis.techtarget.com/definition/VUCA-volatility-uncertainty-complexity-and-ambiguity
http://whatis.techtarget.com/definition/VUCA-volatility-uncertainty-complexity-and-ambiguity
http://www.sleepnomorenyc.com/#share
http://www.sleepnomorenyc.com/#share
http://www.cntraveler.com/stories/2016-04-01/beyond-broadway-why-everyones-trying-immersive-theater
http://www.cntraveler.com/stories/2016-04-01/beyond-broadway-why-everyones-trying-immersive-theater
http://www.cntraveler.com/stories/2016-04-01/beyond-broadway-why-everyones-trying-immersive-theater
https://killscreen.com/versions/immersive-theater-coming-soon-virtual-reality-headset-near/
https://killscreen.com/versions/immersive-theater-coming-soon-virtual-reality-headset-near/
https://killscreen.com/versions/immersive-theater-coming-soon-virtual-reality-headset-near/
https://killscreen.com/versions/immersive-theater-coming-soon-virtual-reality-headset-near/
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Participatory_culture
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Participatory_culture
https://medium.com/%40claybavor/virtual-and-augmented-realities-asking-the-right-questions-and-traveling-the-path-ahead-2428b9d13c01
https://medium.com/%40claybavor/virtual-and-augmented-realities-asking-the-right-questions-and-traveling-the-path-ahead-2428b9d13c01
https://medium.com/%40claybavor/virtual-and-augmented-realities-asking-the-right-questions-and-traveling-the-path-ahead-2428b9d13c01
https://medium.com/%40claybavor/virtual-and-augmented-realities-asking-the-right-questions-and-traveling-the-path-ahead-2428b9d13c01
http://www.independent.co.uk/life-style/gadgets-and-tech/features/apple-tim-cook-boss-brexit-uk-theresa-may-number-10-interview-ustwo-a7574086.html
http://www.independent.co.uk/life-style/gadgets-and-tech/features/apple-tim-cook-boss-brexit-uk-theresa-may-number-10-interview-ustwo-a7574086.html
http://www.independent.co.uk/life-style/gadgets-and-tech/features/apple-tim-cook-boss-brexit-uk-theresa-may-number-10-interview-ustwo-a7574086.html
https://www.idc.com/getdoc.jsp?containerId=prUS42959717
https://www.idc.com/getdoc.jsp?containerId=prUS42959717
https://www.idc.com/getdoc.jsp?containerId=prUS42959717
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/01/after-mixed-year-mobile-ar-to-drive-108-billion-vrar-market-by-2021/#.WZVBTFVJbIX
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/01/after-mixed-year-mobile-ar-to-drive-108-billion-vrar-market-by-2021/#.WZVBTFVJbIX
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/01/after-mixed-year-mobile-ar-to-drive-108-billion-vrar-market-by-2021/#.WZVBTFVJbIX
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/01/after-mixed-year-mobile-ar-to-drive-108-billion-vrar-market-by-2021/#.WZVBTFVJbIX
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/02/record-2-3-billion-vrar-investment-in-2016/#.WY2h7dOGPdQ
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/02/record-2-3-billion-vrar-investment-in-2016/#.WY2h7dOGPdQ
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/02/record-2-3-billion-vrar-investment-in-2016/#.WY2h7dOGPdQ
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/asia/feature/63914/the-size-of-the-vr-consumer-market-updated/
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/asia/feature/63914/the-size-of-the-vr-consumer-market-updated/
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/asia/feature/63914/the-size-of-the-vr-consumer-market-updated/
https://www.superdataresearch.com/market-data/virtual-reality-industry-report/
https://www.superdataresearch.com/market-data/virtual-reality-industry-report/
https://www.superdataresearch.com/market-data/virtual-reality-industry-report/
http://www.goldmansachs.com/our-thinking/pages/technology-driving-innovation-folder/virtual-and-augmented-reality/report.pdf
http://www.goldmansachs.com/our-thinking/pages/technology-driving-innovation-folder/virtual-and-augmented-reality/report.pdf
http://www.goldmansachs.com/our-thinking/pages/technology-driving-innovation-folder/virtual-and-augmented-reality/report.pdf
http://www.sothebysrealty.com/eng/virtual-reality
http://www.sothebysrealty.com/eng/virtual-reality


 

 

 

 

https://www.designboom.com/technology/ford-virtual-reality-lab-vehicle-design-01-15-2017/​,​ 2017, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
21 ​https://www.fastcompany.com/company/nextvr​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
22 ​Amazon Patents Point To AR Tech For Home Try-On. 
https://www.cbinsights.com/research/amazon-augmented-reality-home-try- 
on/?utm_source=CB+Insights+Newsletter&utm_campaign=a1390c459b- 
WedNL_7_26_2017&utm_medium=email&utm_term=0_9dc0513989-a1390c459b-88282953​,​ 2017, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
23 ​Pan Y. Alibaba Unveils Exclusive Luxury Pavilion Courting Super-Wealthy Chinese Shoppers 

https://jingdaily.com/alibaba-launches-luxury-pavilion/​, accessed 17 Aug. 
2017.​https://jingdaily.com/alibaba-launches-luxury-pavilion/ 
24​ ​BOM Report, VR/AR Hype or Serious Business? 
http://cdn.instantmagazine.com/upload/4666/bom_vrar_2017reportpdf.68ec9bc00f1c.pdf​, 
2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
25​ ​Carufel R. Study Examines Obstacles Facing Augmented & Virtual Reality—Lack of Compelling Content Is 
Top Challenge. ​https://www.bulldogreporter.com/study-examines- 
obstacles-facing-augmented-virtual-reality-lack-of-compelling-content-is-top-challenge/​, 2016, accessed 17 
Aug. 2017. 
26​ ​Augmented and Virtual Reality Survey Report. 
https://dpntax5jbd3l.cloudfront.net/images/content/1/5/v2/158662/2016-VR-AR-Survey.pdf​, 2016, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
27​ ​Bozogzadeh A. The VR industry’s biggest threat is underwhelming content. 
https://venturebeat.com/2016/11/26/the-vr-industrys-biggest-threat-is-underwhelming- 
content/​ ​2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
28​ ​BOM Report, VR/AR Hype or Serious Business? 
http://cdn.instantmagazine.com/upload/4666/bom_vrar_2017reportpdf.68ec9bc00f1c.pdf​, 
2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
29​  ​Anon J. Race To Release AR & VR Hardware Leading To Lack Of Content 
https://​www.androidheadlines.com/2017/01/race-to-release-ar-vr-hardware-leading-to-lack-​of-content.ht
ml​, 2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
30​ ​http://www.image-net.org/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
31​ ​Datasets Over Algorithms ​http://www.spacemachine.net/views/2016/3/datasets-over-​ ​algorithms​, 2016, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
32​ ​Bozogzadeh A. The VR industry needs better content, turns to accelerators 
https://venturebeat.com/2017/03/04/the-vr-industry-needs-better-content-turns-to- 
accelerators/​, 2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
33​  ​https://www.unrealengine.com/faq​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017 
34​ ​Robertson A. Oculus is closing its VR film studio 

https://www.theverge.com/2017/5/4/15547844/facebook-oculus-vr-film-story-studio-closing​,​ 2017, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
35 ​Constine J. Facebook launches augmented reality Camera Effects developer platform 

https://techcrunch.com/2017/04/18/facebook-camera-effects-platform/​, 2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017.​ ​36 

Constine J. Apple undercuts Facebook in the augmented reality platform war 

https://techcrunch.com/2017/06/13/augmented-reality-platform-wars/​, 2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
37 ​Slick J. The Top Places to Sell Your 3D Models Online ​https://www.lifewire.com/top-places- 
to-sell-your-3d-models-online-2079​, ​2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
38​https://blender.stackexchange.com/questions/58497/import-obj-file-from-turbosquid-only-diffuse-mater
ial-no-textures​, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
39 ​https://www.cheetah3d.com/forum/showthread.php?t=10704​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 

 

https://www.designboom.com/technology/ford-virtual-reality-lab-vehicle-design-01-15-2017/
https://www.designboom.com/technology/ford-virtual-reality-lab-vehicle-design-01-15-2017/
https://www.fastcompany.com/company/nextvr
https://www.fastcompany.com/company/nextvr
https://www.cbinsights.com/research/amazon-augmented-reality-home-try-on/?utm_source=CB%2BInsights%2BNewsletter&amp;utm_campaign=a1390c459b-WedNL_7_26_2017&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;utm_term=0_9dc0513989-a1390c459b-88282953
https://www.cbinsights.com/research/amazon-augmented-reality-home-try-on/?utm_source=CB%2BInsights%2BNewsletter&amp;utm_campaign=a1390c459b-WedNL_7_26_2017&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;utm_term=0_9dc0513989-a1390c459b-88282953
https://www.cbinsights.com/research/amazon-augmented-reality-home-try-on/?utm_source=CB%2BInsights%2BNewsletter&amp;utm_campaign=a1390c459b-WedNL_7_26_2017&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;utm_term=0_9dc0513989-a1390c459b-88282953
https://www.cbinsights.com/research/amazon-augmented-reality-home-try-on/?utm_source=CB%2BInsights%2BNewsletter&amp;utm_campaign=a1390c459b-WedNL_7_26_2017&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;utm_term=0_9dc0513989-a1390c459b-88282953
https://jingdaily.com/alibaba-launches-luxury-pavilion/
https://jingdaily.com/alibaba-launches-luxury-pavilion/
http://cdn.instantmagazine.com/upload/4666/bom_vrar_2017reportpdf.68ec9bc00f1c.pdf
http://cdn.instantmagazine.com/upload/4666/bom_vrar_2017reportpdf.68ec9bc00f1c.pdf
https://www.bulldogreporter.com/study-examines-obstacles-facing-augmented-virtual-reality-lack-of-compelling-content-is-top-challenge/
https://dpntax5jbd3l.cloudfront.net/images/content/1/5/v2/158662/2016-VR-AR-Survey.pdf
http://cdn.instantmagazine.com/upload/4666/bom_vrar_2017reportpdf.68ec9bc00f1c.pdf
http://cdn.instantmagazine.com/upload/4666/bom_vrar_2017reportpdf.68ec9bc00f1c.pdf
http://www.androidheadlines.com/2017/01/race-to-release-ar-vr-hardware-leading-to-lack-
http://www.image-net.org/
http://www.image-net.org/
http://www.spacemachine.net/views/2016/3/datasets-over-
https://www.unrealengine.com/faq
https://www.unrealengine.com/faq
https://www.theverge.com/2017/5/4/15547844/facebook-oculus-vr-film-story-studio-closing
https://www.theverge.com/2017/5/4/15547844/facebook-oculus-vr-film-story-studio-closing
https://techcrunch.com/2017/04/18/facebook-camera-effects-platform/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/04/18/facebook-camera-effects-platform/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/04/18/facebook-camera-effects-platform/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/06/13/augmented-reality-platform-wars/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/06/13/augmented-reality-platform-wars/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/06/13/augmented-reality-platform-wars/
https://www.lifewire.com/top-places-to-sell-your-3d-models-online-2079
https://www.lifewire.com/top-places-to-sell-your-3d-models-online-2079
https://www.lifewire.com/top-places-to-sell-your-3d-models-online-2079
https://blender.stackexchange.com/questions/58497/import-obj-file-from-turbosquid-only-diffuse-material-no-textures
https://blender.stackexchange.com/questions/58497/import-obj-file-from-turbosquid-only-diffuse-material-no-textures
https://www.cheetah3d.com/forum/showthread.php?t=10704
https://www.cheetah3d.com/forum/showthread.php?t=10704


 

 

 

 

40       ​http://forums.cgarchitect.com/73780-problems-importing-downloaded-3d-models-into- 

3ds-max.html​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
41​  ​https://blog.turbosquid.com/royalty-free-license/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
42​  ​https://blog.turbosquid.com/royalty-free-license/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
43​  ​https://www.cgtrader.com/faq/page/11​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
44​        ​https://help.netrinomedia.com/item/basic-and-extended-license-usage-examples/​, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
45​ ​https://www.renderosity.com/mod/wiki/?policies&license​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017 
46 ​Citi GPS: Global Perspectives & Solutions. Virtual and augmented reality: Are you sure it isn’t  real? 
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and- 
augmented-reality.pdf​, 2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
47 ​Pilkington M. Blockchain technology: principles and applications. 
https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/Papers.cfm?abstract_id=2662660​ ​2016​, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
48 ​Monitor Deloitte. Blockchain@Telco 
https://www2.deloitte.com/content/dam/Deloitte/za/Documents/technology-media- 
telecommunications/za_TMT_Blockchain_TelCo.pdf 
49 ​Olusegun Ogundeji.Ethereum Market: How to Make Blockchain Work Better For e- Commerce 
https://cointelegraph.com/news/ethereum-market-how-to-make-blockchain- 
work-better-for-e-commerce​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
50    ​https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/public-sector/articles/blockchain-opportunities- 
for-health-care.html​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
51 ​Worldwide Retail Ecommerce Sales Will Reach $1.915 Trillion This Year 
https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915- 
Trillion-This-Year/1014369​, ​2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
52 ​Loguidice B. The pitfalls and potential of inexpensive 3D scanning solutions 
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2017/06/reality-check-personal-3d-scanning-has-come-far- 
but-its-no-copy-machine-yet/​ ​2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
53 ​Nagpal M. ​14 eCommerce Product Page Best Practices for Your Website 
https://vwo.com/blog/ecommerce-product-page-best-practices/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
54  ​https://github.com/EOSIO/Documentation/blob/master/Roadmap.md 
55 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fibonacci_number​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
56 ​The Four Waves of Augmented Reality. ​http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and- 
research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
57 ​Kovach S. Google's augmented reality project is the coolest thing it showed off this week. 
http://www.businessinsider.com/google-tango-2017-5/#this-woman-took-a-photo-with-a-​ ​virtual-lion-6​, 
2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
58 ​The Four Waves Of Augmented Reality​. http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and- 
research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
59 ​Sullivan M. Apple Is Working Hard On An iPhone Rear-Facing 3D Laser For AR And Autofocus: Source 

https://www.fastcompany.com/40440342/apple-is-working-hard-on-an- 

iphone-8-rear-facing-3d-laser-for-ar-and-autofocus-source​, ​2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
60 ​Robertson A. Breaking down Apple’s new augmented reality platform. 

https://www.theverge.com/2017/6/6/15742736/apple-arkit-augmented-reality-platform- 

wwdc-breakdown​, ​2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
61 ​Mobile AR to Top a Billion Users and 60 Billion by 2021. ​http://www.digi- 
capital.com/news/2017/06/mobile-ar-to-top-a-billion-users-and-60-billion-by-2021/​, 2017,​ ​accessed 
17 Aug. 2017. 
62​ ​Citi Research, Virtual and Augmented Reality Report. 

https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented- 

 

http://forums.cgarchitect.com/73780-problems-importing-downloaded-3d-models-into-3ds-max.html
http://forums.cgarchitect.com/73780-problems-importing-downloaded-3d-models-into-3ds-max.html
http://forums.cgarchitect.com/73780-problems-importing-downloaded-3d-models-into-3ds-max.html
https://blog.turbosquid.com/royalty-free-license/
https://blog.turbosquid.com/royalty-free-license/
https://blog.turbosquid.com/royalty-free-license/
https://blog.turbosquid.com/royalty-free-license/
https://www.cgtrader.com/faq/page/112
https://www.cgtrader.com/faq/page/112
https://help.netrinomedia.com/item/basic-and-extended-license-usage-examples/
https://help.netrinomedia.com/item/basic-and-extended-license-usage-examples/
https://help.netrinomedia.com/item/basic-and-extended-license-usage-examples/
https://www.renderosity.com/mod/wiki/?policies&amp;license
https://www.renderosity.com/mod/wiki/?policies&amp;license
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/Papers.cfm?abstract_id=2662660
https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/Papers.cfm?abstract_id=2662660
https://www2.deloitte.com/content/dam/Deloitte/za/Documents/technology-media-telecommunications/za_TMT_Blockchain_TelCo.pdf
https://www2.deloitte.com/content/dam/Deloitte/za/Documents/technology-media-telecommunications/za_TMT_Blockchain_TelCo.pdf
https://cointelegraph.com/news/ethereum-market-how-to-make-blockchain-work-better-for-e-commerce
https://cointelegraph.com/news/ethereum-market-how-to-make-blockchain-work-better-for-e-commerce
https://cointelegraph.com/news/ethereum-market-how-to-make-blockchain-work-better-for-e-commerce
https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/public-sector/articles/blockchain-opportunities-for-health-care.html
https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/public-sector/articles/blockchain-opportunities-for-health-care.html
https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/public-sector/articles/blockchain-opportunities-for-health-care.html
https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-Trillion-This-Year/1014369
https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-Trillion-This-Year/1014369
https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-Trillion-This-Year/1014369
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2017/06/reality-check-personal-3d-scanning-has-come-far-but-its-no-copy-machine-yet/
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2017/06/reality-check-personal-3d-scanning-has-come-far-but-its-no-copy-machine-yet/
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2017/06/reality-check-personal-3d-scanning-has-come-far-but-its-no-copy-machine-yet/
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/
https://vwo.com/blog/ecommerce-product-page-best-practices/
https://vwo.com/blog/ecommerce-product-page-best-practices/
https://github.com/EOSIO/Documentation/blob/master/Roadmap.md
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fibonacci_number
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fibonacci_number
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/
http://www.businessinsider.com/google-tango-2017-5/#this-woman-took-a-photo-with-a-virtual-lion-6
http://www.businessinsider.com/google-tango-2017-5/#this-woman-took-a-photo-with-a-virtual-lion-6
http://www.businessinsider.com/google-tango-2017-5/#this-woman-took-a-photo-with-a-virtual-lion-6
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/
http://www.thevirtualreport.biz/data-and-research/64512/the-four-waves-of-augmented-reality/
https://www.fastcompany.com/40440342/apple-is-working-hard-on-an-iphone-8-rear-facing-3d-laser-for-ar-and-autofocus-source
https://www.fastcompany.com/40440342/apple-is-working-hard-on-an-iphone-8-rear-facing-3d-laser-for-ar-and-autofocus-source
https://www.fastcompany.com/40440342/apple-is-working-hard-on-an-iphone-8-rear-facing-3d-laser-for-ar-and-autofocus-source
https://www.theverge.com/2017/6/6/15742736/apple-arkit-augmented-reality-platform-wwdc-breakdown
https://www.theverge.com/2017/6/6/15742736/apple-arkit-augmented-reality-platform-wwdc-breakdown
https://www.theverge.com/2017/6/6/15742736/apple-arkit-augmented-reality-platform-wwdc-breakdown
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/06/mobile-ar-to-top-a-billion-users-and-60-billion-by-2021/
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/06/mobile-ar-to-top-a-billion-users-and-60-billion-by-2021/
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/06/mobile-ar-to-top-a-billion-users-and-60-billion-by-2021/
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/06/mobile-ar-to-top-a-billion-users-and-60-billion-by-2021/
http://www.digi-capital.com/news/2017/06/mobile-ar-to-top-a-billion-users-and-60-billion-by-2021/
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf


 

 

 

 

reality.pdf​, ​2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
63​ ​Anderson D. These smartglasses could replace your desktop computer — here's what they're   like. 
http://www.businessinsider.com/meta-augmented-reality-smartglasses- 
interactive-holograms-replace-computers-2017-7​, ​2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
64​ ​Etherington D. Google Glass is back with hardware focused on the enterprise. 
https://techcrunch.com/2017/07/18/google-glass-is-back-with-hardware-focused-on- 
the-​enterprise/​, 2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
65 ​Bright P. $3,000 HoloLens dev kit available for pre-order now, shipping March 30. 
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2016/02/3000-hololens-dev-kit-available-for-pre-order- 
now-shipping-march-30/​, 2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
66 ​Ward J. Google Glass and HoloLens clash in the enterprise en route to consumers.               
https://www.windowscentral.com/google-glass-and-hololens-clash-enterprise-route- ​consumers​, ​2017,   
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
67 ​Merel T. The reality of VR/AR growth. ​https://techcrunch.com/2017/01/11/the-reality-of-vrar-​ ​growth/​, 
2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
68 ​Swider M. HTC Vive vs Oculus Rift: which VR headset is better? 

http://www.techradar.com/news/wearables/htc-vive-vs-oculus-rift-1301375​, 2017, accessed 17 ​Aug. 2017. 
69 ​Lang B. HTC Just Earmarked $100 Million to Invest in VR Content, Applications Open Today 
https://www.roadtovr.com/htc-vive-x-accelerator-100-million-investment-fund-virtual-​ ​reality/​, ​2016, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
70 ​Matney L. With new realities to build, Unity positioned to become tech giant 
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-​ ​tech-giant/​, 
2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
71 ​https://unity3d.com/vr-ar​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
72 ​Matney L. With new realities to build, Unity positioned to become tech giant 
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-​ ​tech-giant/, 
2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
73 ​Sweeney T. AR And VR For The Rest of Us ​https://www.unrealengine.com/en-US/blog/epic- 
unreal-engine-wwdc-2017​, ​2017, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
74 ​3D Printing (3DP) Market Share, Industry Analysis Report, 2014-2025. 

http://www.grandviewresearch.com/industry-analysis/3d-printing-industry-analysis​, 2017, 
accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
75 ​Dodziuk H. Applications of 3D printing in healthcare 
https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC5071603/#CIT0006​, 2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
76 ​https://unity3d.com/solutions/photogrammetry​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
77 ​Hutchins D. New standard for 3D Model Files. ​http://www.machinedesign.com/cad/new- 
standard-3d-model-files​, ​2013, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
78 ​Gedda R. How 3D visualisation will change the shape of e-commerce 
http://www.techradar.com/news/wearables/how-3d-visualisation-will-change-the-shape-of- 
e-c​ommerce-1315105​, 2016, accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 
79 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/360-degree_video​, ​accessed 17 Aug. 2017. 

 

https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
https://www.citi.com/commercialbank/insights/assets/docs/virtual-and-augmented-reality.pdf
http://www.businessinsider.com/meta-augmented-reality-smartglasses-interactive-holograms-replace-computers-2017-7
http://www.businessinsider.com/meta-augmented-reality-smartglasses-interactive-holograms-replace-computers-2017-7
http://www.businessinsider.com/meta-augmented-reality-smartglasses-interactive-holograms-replace-computers-2017-7
https://techcrunch.com/2017/07/18/google-glass-is-back-with-hardware-focused-on-the-enterprise/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/07/18/google-glass-is-back-with-hardware-focused-on-the-enterprise/
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2016/02/3000-hololens-dev-kit-available-for-pre-order-now-shipping-march-30/
https://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2016/02/3000-hololens-dev-kit-available-for-pre-order-now-shipping-march-30/
https://www.windowscentral.com/google-glass-and-hololens-clash-enterprise-route-consumers
https://www.windowscentral.com/google-glass-and-hololens-clash-enterprise-route-consumers
https://www.windowscentral.com/google-glass-and-hololens-clash-enterprise-route-consumers
https://techcrunch.com/2017/01/11/the-reality-of-vrar-growth/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/01/11/the-reality-of-vrar-growth/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/01/11/the-reality-of-vrar-growth/
http://www.techradar.com/news/wearables/htc-vive-vs-oculus-rift-1301375
http://www.techradar.com/news/wearables/htc-vive-vs-oculus-rift-1301375
https://www.roadtovr.com/htc-vive-x-accelerator-100-million-investment-fund-virtual-reality/
https://www.roadtovr.com/htc-vive-x-accelerator-100-million-investment-fund-virtual-reality/
https://www.roadtovr.com/htc-vive-x-accelerator-100-million-investment-fund-virtual-reality/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-tech-giant/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-tech-giant/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-tech-giant/
https://unity3d.com/vr-ar
https://unity3d.com/vr-ar
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-tech-giant/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-tech-giant/
https://techcrunch.com/2017/05/25/with-new-realities-to-build-unity-positioned-to-become-tech-giant/
https://www.unrealengine.com/en-US/blog/epic-unreal-engine-wwdc-2017
https://www.unrealengine.com/en-US/blog/epic-unreal-engine-wwdc-2017
https://www.unrealengine.com/en-US/blog/epic-unreal-engine-wwdc-2017
http://www.grandviewresearch.com/industry-analysis/3d-printing-industry-analysis
https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC5071603/#CIT0006
https://unity3d.com/solutions/photogrammetry
https://unity3d.com/solutions/photogrammetry
http://www.machinedesign.com/cad/new-
http://www.machinedesign.com/cad/new-standard-3d-model-files
http://www.machinedesign.com/cad/new-standard-3d-model-files
http://www.techradar.com/news/wearables/how-3d-visualisation-will-change-the-shape-of-e-commerce-1315105
http://www.techradar.com/news/wearables/how-3d-visualisation-will-change-the-shape-of-e-commerce-1315105
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/360-degree_video
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/360-degree_video

